CIK: 1082554
Company Name: UNITED THERAPEUTICS CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2022-02-24
Accession Number: 0001082554-22-000004


Item 1 Business Overview We build on the strength of our research and development expertise and a distinctive, entrepreneurial culture that encourages diversity, innovation, creativity, sustainability, and, simply, fun. Since inception, our mission has been to find a cure for pulmonary arterial hypertension ( PAH ) and other life threatening diseases. Toward this goal we have successfully obtained approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) for five medicines, we are always conducting new clinical trials, and we are working to create an unlimited supply of manufactured organs for transplantation. We are the first publicly traded biotech or pharmaceutical company to take the form of a public benefit corporation ( PBC ). Our public benefit purpose is to provide a brighter future for patients through (a) the development of novel pharmaceutical therapies; and (b) technologies that expand the availability of transplantable organs . At the same time, we seek to provide our shareholders with superior financial performance and our communities with earth sensitive energy utilization. We market and sell four commercial therapies in the United States to treat PAH Tyvaso (treprostinil) Inhalation Solution ( Tyvaso ), which includes the Tyvaso Inhalation System; Remodulin (treprostinil) Injection ( Remodulin ); Orenitram (treprostinil) Extended Release Tablets ( Orenitram ); and Adcirca (tadalafil) Tablets ( Adcirca ). Tyvaso has also been approved to treat pulmonary hypertension associated with interstitial lung disease ( PH ILD ). In the United States, we also market and sell an oncology product, Unituxin (dinutuximab) Injection ( Unituxin ), which is approved for treatment of high risk neuroblastoma, and the Remunity Pump for Remodulin ( Remunity ). Outside the United States, we generate revenues from the sale of Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Unituxin. We are actively advancing a pipeline of research and development projects that includes new indications, formulations, and delivery devices for our existing products, as well as new products to treat PAH and other conditions. Our principal executive offices are located at 1040 Spring Street, Silver Spring, Maryland 20910 and at 55 T.W. Alexander Drive, Research Triangle Park, North Carolina 27709. Unless the context requires otherwise or unless otherwise noted, all references in this Annual Report on Form 10 K (this Report ) to United Therapeutics and to the company , we , us or our are to United Therapeutics Corporation and its subsidiaries. Our Commercial Products Our commercial product portfolio consists of the following Product Mode of Delivery Indication Current Status Our Territory Tyvaso Inhaled via ultrasonic nebulizer PAH and PH ILD Commercial sales in the U.S., Argentina, and Israel Worldwide Remodulin Continuous subcutaneous PAH Commercial sales in the U.S., most of Europe, Argentina, Canada, Chile, Columbia, Israel, Japan, Mexico, Peru, South Korea, and Venezuela Worldwide Remodulin Continuous intravenous PAH Commercial sales in the U.S., most of Europe, Argentina, Canada, Columbia, Israel, Japan, Mexico, Peru, Saudi Arabia, and South Korea Worldwide Remunity Pump for Remodulin Continuous subcutaneous via pre filled cartridges PAH Commercial sales in the U.S. Worldwide Orenitram Oral PAH Commercial sales in the U.S. Worldwide Unituxin Intravenous High risk neuroblastoma Commercial sales in the U.S., Canada, and Japan Worldwide Adcirca Oral PAH Commercial sales in the U.S. United States Tyvaso is only approved for PAH in Argentina and Israel. Remodulin is marketed and sold in most of the major European markets other than the United Kingdom. 2021 Annual Report 3 Products to Treat Pulmonary Hypertension The World Health Organization ( WHO ) has classified pulmonary hypertension into five groups. PAH is designated as WHO Group 1, which includes multiple etiologies such as idiopathic (meaning the cause is unknown) and heritable PAH, as well as PAH associated with connective tissue diseases. Pulmonary hypertension associated with lung disease, such as PH ILD, has been classified as WHO Group 3 pulmonary hypertension. In addition, patients with PAH are classified into classes based on clinical severity, ranging from functional class I (no symptoms) through functional class IV (severe symptoms). Labeled indications for PAH therapies often note that clinical studies for the drug predominantly included patients in 1 or more functional classes. Our pulmonary hypertension products were initially approved to treat only PAH. In March 2021, 1 of our products Tyvaso was approved to treat PH ILD in addition to PAH. We are engaged in further research and development for additional indications for Tyvaso. For further details, see Research and Development below. PAH is a life threatening disease that affects the blood vessels in the lungs and is characterized by increased pressure in the pulmonary arteries, which are the blood vessels leading from the heart to the lungs. The elevated pressure in the pulmonary arteries strains the right side of the heart as it pumps blood to the lungs. This eventually leads to right heart failure and, ultimately, death. PAH is characterized by structural changes in blood vessel walls, aggregation of platelets, and alteration of smooth muscle cell function. We believe that PAH affects about 500,000 individuals worldwide. We have seen increases in the number of people diagnosed with the disease, but due to the rarity of the disease and the complexity of diagnosing it, only a small fraction of patients with PAH are being treated. Current therapies approved by the FDA for PAH focus on 3 distinct molecular pathways the prostacyclin pathway, the nitric oxide pathway, and the endothelin pathway. The classes of drugs that target these 3 pathways are Prostacyclin Analogues and IP Prostacyclin Receptor Agonists. Patients with PAH have been shown to have reduced levels of prostacyclin, a naturally occurring molecule that relaxes the pulmonary blood vessels, prevents platelet aggregation, and inhibits the proliferation of smooth muscle cells in the pulmonary vessels. Drugs that mimic the action of prostacyclin, known as prostacyclin analogues, are established PAH treatments. Another class of therapy, called IP prostacyclin receptor agonists, also addresses PAH through the prostacyclin pathway. As compared with prostacyclin analogues, which broadly mimic the effect of prostacyclin, IP prostacyclin receptor agonists bind selectively to (and activate) the IP receptor, 1 of several prostacyclin receptors. Phosphodiesterase Type 5 ( PDE 5 ) Inhibitors and Soluble Guanylate Cyclase ( sGC ) Stimulators. Patients with PAH have also been shown to have reduced levels of the enzyme responsible for producing nitric oxide, a naturally occurring substance in the body that causes relaxation of the pulmonary blood vessels. Nitric oxide produces this effect by increasing intracellular levels of cyclic guanosine monophosphate GMP ( cyclic GMP ). Therefore, another established therapeutic approach has been to inhibit the degradation of cyclic GMP using drugs known as PDE 5 inhibitors. In addition, sGC is an enzyme found in the endothelial cells and the receptor for nitric oxide. When nitric oxide binds to sGC, the enzyme enhances production of cyclic GMP. As a result, sGC stimulators are also approved to treat PAH. Endothelin Receptor Antagonists. PAH patients have also been shown to have elevated levels of endothelin 1, a naturally occurring peptide in the body that causes constriction of, and structural changes to, the pulmonary blood vessels. Therefore, another established therapeutic approach has been to block the action of endothelin with drugs that are known as endothelin receptor antagonists ( ETRAs ). Because any or all of the 3 pathways may be therapeutic targets in a patient, these classes of drugs are used al1 or in combination to treat patients with PAH. We currently market drugs in 2 of these classes. Remodulin, Tyvaso, and Orenitram are all formulations of treprostinil, a prostacyclin analogue, and Adcirca is a PDE 5 inhibitor. PH ILD is also a rare condition, impacting at least 30,000 patients in the United States. In March 2021, Tyvaso became the first and only FDA approved therapy to treat PH ILD. Previously, several other leading therapies had been studied in PH ILD patients, but did not show benefit, and in some cases may have shown adverse consequences. Tyvaso Tyvaso was initially approved by the FDA to treat PAH and launched commercially in the United States in 2009. We sell Tyvaso to specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States. We recognized $607.5 million, $4833 million, and $415.6 million in Tyvaso net product sales, representing 36 percent, 33 percent, and 29 percent of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively. Tyvaso is approved and commercialized in the United States, Israel, and Argentina. Tyvaso is administered four times a day by inhaling up to twelve breaths during each treatment session, which takes approximately 3 minutes. Tyvaso is required to be administered using our proprietary Tyvaso Inhalation System, which consists of an ultrasonic nebulizer and related accessories. A single ampule containing Tyvaso is emptied into the Tyvaso Inhalation System once per day, so the Tyvaso Inhalation System only needs to be cleaned once daily. Tyvaso is regulated by the FDA as a drug device combination product, consisting of Tyvaso drug product and the Tyvaso Inhalation System. Ventavis (iloprost) is the only other FDA approved inhaled prostacyclin analogue that is available on the market. Patients need to inhale Ventavis six to nine times per day via a nebulizer. According to its package insert, each Ventavis inhalation consists of 4 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation four to ten minutes of continuous inhalation via the nebulizer. We completed an open label study in the United States to investigate the clinical effects of switching patients from Ventavis to Tyvaso. Patients in this study saved an average of approximately 14 hours per day when administering Tyvaso compared to Ventavis. Studies establishing the effectiveness of Tyvaso included predominately PAH patients with functional class III symptoms (patients who may not have symptoms at rest but whose activities are greatly limited by shortness of breath, fatigue, or near fainting). Tyvaso was generally well tolerated in our trials. The most common side effects were transient cough, headache, nausea, dizziness, and flushing. In February 2020, we reported the results of the INCREASE phase 3 registration study of Tyvaso in patients with PH ILD, including patients with underlying idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis ( IPF ) and combined pulmonary fibrosis and emphysema. The study met all of its primary and secondary endpoints. In January and June 2021, data from the INCREASE study were published in the New England Journal of Medicine and The Lancet Respiratory Medicine , respectively. In March 2021, the FDA approved our efficacy supplement to the Tyvaso NDA, which resulted in revised labeling reflecting the outcome of the INCREASE study. As a result, Tyvaso became the first and only therapy approved by the FDA to treat PH ILD, which we estimate affects at least 30,000 patients in the United States. We are working with an international distributor to seek approval of Tyvaso for PH ILD in Europe and other territories outside the United States, on the basis of the INCREASE study results. In August 2018, we settled patent litigation with Watson Laboratories, Inc. ( Watson ) related to its abbreviated new drug application ( ANDA ) seeking FDA approval to market a generic version of Tyvaso in the United States. Under the terms of this settlement, Watson may launch its generic version of Tyvaso in the United States beginning in January 2026, although Watson may be permitted to enter the market earlier under certain circumstances. For further detail, see the section below entitled Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights . Remodulin Remodulin was approved by the FDA for subcutaneous and intravenous administration in 2002 and 2004, respectively, and has been sold commercially in the United States since 2002 We sell Remodulin to specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States and to pharmaceutical distributors internationally. We recognized $5137 million, $516.7 million, and $587.0 million in Remodulin net product sales, representing 31 percent, 35 percent, and 40 percent of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively. Remodulin is indicated to treat patients with PAH to diminish symptoms associated with exercise. Studies establishing effectiveness included patients with functional class II IV (moderate to severe) symptoms. Outside of the United States, Remodulin is marketed and sold for treatment of PAH throughout most of Europe, Canada, Mexico, and various countries throughout Asia, the Middle East, and South America, as noted in the table above. We believe that Remodulin has many qualities that make it an appealing alternative to competitive therapies. Remodulin is stable at room temperature, so it does not need to be cooled during infusion and patients do not need to use cooling packs or refrigeration to keep it stable. Treprostinil is highly soluble under certain circumstances and highly potent, which enables us to manufacture Remodulin in concentrated solutions. This allows therapeutic concentrations of Remodulin to be delivered at very low flow rates via miniaturized infusion pumps for both subcutaneous and intravenous infusion. Remodulin can be continuously infused for up to 48 hours before refilling the external infusion pump. This profile contrasts favorably with non treprostinil based, continuously infused prostacyclin therapies on the market Flolan , Veletri , and generic epoprostenol. Flolan and generic epoprostenol are not stable at room temperature (and therefore require refrigeration or the use of cooling packs), but Veletri may be stable at room temperature depending on its concentration. Flolan, generic epoprostenol, and Veletri have shorter half lives than Remodulin, requiring mixing prior to pump refills. N1 of these competitive products may be administered via subcutaneous infusion, and therefore may only be delivered intravenously. We also face competition from manufacturers of generic versions of Remodulin in the United States and abroad. See the section below entitled Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights . Patients must use external pumps manufactured by third parties to deliver Remodulin. Smiths Medical, Inc. ( Smiths Medical ) manufactures the pumps used by most patients in the United States to administer Remodulin, including the CADD MS 3 ( MS 3 ) pump used to deliver subcutaneous Remodulin, and the CADD Legacy pump to deliver intravenous Remodulin. In 2015, Smiths Medical notified us that it was planning to discontinue the manufacture of the MS 3 pumps and associated cartridges. We entered into an agreement with Smiths Medical for us to fund the manufacture of a further supply of MS 3 pumps and cartridges for use with branded Remodulin only. We recently launched sales of a next generation subcutaneous pump called the Remunity Pump, and are developing additional next generation subcutaneous and intravenous delivery systems as noted below under Research and Development . There are serious side effects associated with Remodulin. For example, when infused subcutaneously, Remodulin causes varying degrees of infusion site pain and reaction (redness and swelling) in most patients. Patients who cannot tolerate the infusion site pain related to the use of subcutaneous Remodulin may instead use intravenous Remodulin. Intravenous Remodulin is delivered continuously through a surgically implanted central venous catheter, similar to Flolan, Veletri, and generic epoprostenol. Patients who receive therapy through implanted venous catheters have a risk of developing blood stream infections and a serious systemic infection known as sepsis. Other common side effects associated with both subcutaneous and intravenous Remodulin 2021 Annual Report 5 include headache, diarrhea, nausea, jaw pain, vasodilation, and edema. As noted below under Research and Development , we are working on a prodrug version of Remodulin called RemoPro to reduce the infusion site pain associated with subcutaneous administration of treprostinil. Remunity Pump In February 2021, we launched limited commercial sales of the Remunity Pump, which is a pre filled, semi disposable system for subcutaneous delivery of treprostinil, developed in collaboration with DEKA Research & Development Corp ( DEKA ) under an exclusive development and license agreement. The Remunity Pump consists of a small, lightweight, durable pump and controller designed to have a service life of at least 3 years. The Remunity Pump uses disposable cartridges filled with Remodulin, which can be connected to the pump with less patient manipulation than is typically involved in filling other currently available subcutaneous pumps. In November 2019, we entered into a supply agreement with an affiliate of DEKA to manufacture and supply the Remunity Pump to us. Under the terms of the agreement, we reimburse all of DEKA and its affiliates costs to manufacture the Remunity Pump. The Remunity Pump is being offered to patients primarily by contracted specialty pharmacies, which deliver Remunity Pump disposable cartridges pre filled exclusively with Remodulin. As noted below under Research and Development , we are working on a new version of the Remunity Pump that enables us to pre fill cartridges as part of the manufacturing process. This version is expected to have an extended shelf life and simplified supply chain, and will allow patients to keep more drug product on hand. Based on initial feedback from Remunity patients shortly after launch, we learned that the pump alarms can in some cases be overly sensitive. These alarm issues do not raise safety concerns, but to ensure a continued positive experience with the pump, we recently paused the introduction of new patients to Remunity while we work with DEKA to optimize the alarm profile. We are conducting final testing of the pump alarms before we continue with our broader launch. Orenitram Orenitram is the only FDA approved, orally administered prostacyclin analogue, and is the only oral PAH prostacyclin class therapy approved in the United States that is titratable to a maximum tolerated dose without a dose ceiling. In 2013, the FDA approved Orenitram for treatment of PAH patients to improve exercise capacity. The primary study that supported efficacy of Orenitram was a 12 week monotherapy study in which PAH patients were not on any approved background PAH therapy. In August 2018, we announced that our clinical study of Orenitram called FREEDOM EV had met its primary endpoint of delayed time to first clinical worsening event. In particular, the preliminary results showed that Orenitram, when taken with an oral PAH background therapy, decreased the risk of a clinical worsening event versus placebo by 25 percent (p=0.0391), driven by a 61 percent decrease in the risk of disease progression for patients taking Orenitram, when compared to placebo (p=0.0002). In October 2019, the FDA approved a supplement to our new drug application ( NDA ) to update the Orenitram label to reflect the FREEDOM EV results. As a result, Orenitram is now indicated to delay disease progression and improve exercise capacity. Mortality rates were similar between Orenitram and placebo groups at the end of randomized treatment. However, in participants for whom data are available (89 percent), Orenitram was associated with a 37 percent decreased risk of mortality compared with placebo at study closure (p=0.0324). These mortality data are not reflected in the FDA approved label because they include data accrued in the open label extension study. Secondary endpoints in the FREEDOM EV study included changes from baseline in six minute walk distance ( 6MWD ), Borg dyspnea score (shortness of breath test), functional class, NT proBNP levels, and combined 6MWD and Borg dyspnea score. Secondary endpoint data, which are not included in the updated FDA approved labeling, are summarized below Change in 6MWD The median 6MWD trended toward improvement at week 24 (Hodges Lehmann treatment estimate seven meters). Median 6MWD improved with Orenitram at weeks 36 (13 meters) and 48 (21 meters) compared to placebo. Change in Borg dyspnea score and WHO functional class When classified categorically as improved, no change, or deteriorated, participants in the Orenitram group exhibited a significantly positive shift in Borg dyspnea score and WHO functional class compared to placebo at weeks 24, 36, and 48. Change in NT proBNP levels NT proBNP levels were significantly improved with Orenitram at weeks 24 and 36. Per the study protocol, NT proBNP was not assessed at week 48. Change in combined 6MWD and Borg dyspnea score Combined 6MWD and Borg dyspnea score was significantly improved with Orenitram when assessed at week 24 compared to placebo. In 2020, we published the results of a retrospective study in which selexipag was associated with 67 percent higher PAH associated healthcare costs on average, during the first six months of therapy, compared to Orenitram. Selexipag and Orenitram are the only FDA approved oral prostacyclin class therapies. We sell Orenitram to the same specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States that distribute Tyvaso and Remodulin. We recognized $306.1 million, $2931 million, and $225.3 million in Orenitram net product sales, representing 18 percent, 20 percent, and 16 percent of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively. The studies that established efficacy included predominately patients with functional class II III symptoms and etiologies of idiopathic or heritable PAH (66 percent) or PAH associated with connective tissue disease (26 percent). The most common side effects 6 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation observed in our clinical studies were headache, nausea, and diarrhea. Orenitram is currently only approved in the United States. Our distributors are pursuing approval of Orenitram in certain countries outside the United States. In February 2018, we settled patent litigation with Actavis Laboratories FL, Inc. ( Actavis ) related to its ANDA seeking FDA approval to market a generic version of Orenitram in the United States. Under the terms of this settlement, Actavis may launch its generic version of Orenitram in the United States beginning in June 2027, although Actavis may be permitted to enter the market earlier under certain circumstances. We are also engaged in patent litigation with another generic company, ANI Pharmaceuticals, Inc., regarding its ANDA seeking to market a generic version of Orenitram in the United States. For further detail, see the section below entitled Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights . Adcirca Adcirca is a PDE 5 inhibitor, the active pharmaceutical ingredient of which is tadalafil. Tadalafil is also the active pharmaceutical ingredient in Cialis , which is marketed by Eli Lilly and Company ( Lilly ) for treatment of erectile dysfunction. We acquired the commercial rights to Adcirca for treatment of PAH in the United States from Lilly in 2008. We sell Adcirca at prices established by Lilly, which are at parity with Cialis pricing. We recognized $55.9 million, $67.3 million, and $107.2 million in Adcirca net product sales, representing 3 percent, four percent, and seven percent of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively. In 2009, the FDA approved Adcirca with a recommended dose of 40 mg, making it the only once daily PDE 5 inhibitor for treatment of PAH. Adcirca is indicated to improve exercise ability in patients with PAH. Studies establishing effectiveness included predominately patients with functional class II III symptoms. Headaches were the most commonly reported side effect. In August 2018, Mylan N.V. announced the launch of its generic version of Adcirca, which resulted in a material adverse impact on Adcirca net product sales. Additional companies launched generic versions of Adcirca in February 2019. In June 2020, we amended our Adcirca license agreement to extend its term through December 31, 2023 For further detail, see the section below entitled Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights. Product to Treat Cancer Unituxin In March 2015, the FDA approved our Biologics License Application ( BLA ) for Unituxin, in combination with granulocyte macrophage colony stimulating factor, interleukin 2, and 13 cis retinoic acid, for treatment of patients with high risk neuroblastoma (a rare form of pediatric cancer) who achieve at least a partial response to prior first line multiagent, multimodality therapy. Unituxin is a chimeric monoclonal antibody composed of a combination of mouse and human DNA that induces antibody dependent cell mediated cytotoxicity, a mechanism of cell mediated immunity whereby the immune system actively targets a cell that has been bound by specific antibodies. Unituxin therapy is associated with severe side effects, including infections, infusion reactions, hypokalemia, hypotension, pain, fever, and capillary leak syndrome. In November 2018, we received approval from Health Canada to market Unituxin, and we launched commercial sales of the product in Canada in late 2019. In June 2021, our Japanese distributor obtained approval to market Unituxin in Japan, and launched sales shortly thereafter. We recognized $2023 million, $1229 million, and $1137 million in Unituxin net product sales, representing 12 percent, eight percent, and eight percent of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively. Research and Development We focus most of our research and development efforts on the following pipeline programs. We also engage in a variety of additional research and development efforts, including technologies designed to increase the supply of transplantable organs and tissues and improve outcomes for transplant recipients through regenerative medicine, 3 D organ bioprinting, xenotransplantation, and ex vivo lung perfusion. Please note that our expectations regarding our research and development programs are subject to the risks described below under Management Discussion and Analysis Impact of COVID 19 on our Business, and Risk Factors Risks Related to our Products We face risks and uncertainties related to the COVID 19 pandemic, which could significantly disrupt our operations and or business for an unknown period of time. 2021 Annual Report 7 Select Pipeline Programs Product Mode of Delivery Indication Current Status STUDY NAME Our Territory Tyvaso DPI (treprostinil) Inhaled dry powder via pre filled, single use cartridges PAH and PH ILD Phase 3 BREEZE and pivotal pharmacokinetic studies completed; NDA pending with FDA, with decision anticipated by May 2022 Worldwide Tyvaso (treprostinil) Inhaled PH COPD Phase 3 PERFECT study Worldwide RemoPro (subcutaneous Remodulin prodrug) Continuous subcutaneous PAH Phase 1 Worldwide Tyvaso (treprostinil) Inhaled IPF Phase 3 TETON studies Worldwide Ralinepag (IP receptor agonist) Oral PAH Phase 3 ADVANCE studies Worldwide, subject to out licenses granted in certain Asian territories Aurora GT (gene therapy) Intravenous PAH SAPPHIRE study (registration phase in Canada) United States Remunity Pump and RemoPro As noted above under Products to Treat Pulmonary Arterial Hypertension Remunity Pump , in February 2021, we launched commercial sales of the Remunity Pump, which is a pre filled, semi disposable system for subcutaneous delivery of treprostinil, developed in collaboration with DEKA under an exclusive development and license agreement. The Remunity Pump consists of a small, lightweight, durable pump and separate controller. The Remunity Pump uses disposable cartridges filled with Remodulin, which can be connected to the pump with less patient manipulation than is typically involved in filling other currently available subcutaneous pumps. In November 2019, we entered into a supply agreement with an affiliate of DEKA to manufacture and supply the Remunity Pump to us. Under the terms of the agreement, we reimburse all of DEKA and its affiliates costs to manufacture the Remunity Pump. The Remunity Pump is being offered to patients primarily by contracted specialty pharmacies, which deliver Remunity Pump disposable cartridges pre filled exclusively with Remodulin. We are also developing a version of the system that will include disposable comp1nts that are pre filled as part of the manufacturing process. This version is expected to have an extended shelf life and simplified supply chain, and will allow patients to keep more drug product on hand. We are conducting a series of phase 1 studies to develop a new prodrug of treprostinil called RemoPro, which is intended to enable subcutaneous delivery of treprostinil therapy without the site pain currently associated with subcutaneous Remodulin. As a prodrug, RemoPro is designed to be inactive in the subcutaneous tissue, which should decrease or eliminate site pain, and to metabolize into treprostinil once it is absorbed into the blood. Finally, we are collaborating with 2 medical device manufacturers to develop additional next generation pump systems for Remodulin. Tyvaso PERFECT and TETON studies We are enrolling a phase 3 registration study called PERFECT , which is a study of Tyvaso in patients with WHO Group 3 pulmonary hypertension associated with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease ( PH COPD ). There are presently no FDA approved therapies indicated for treatment of PH COPD, which we estimate affects 100,000 patients in the United States. We are also enrolling a phase 3 study called TETON 1 , which is a study of Tyvaso in patients with IPF. The primary endpoint of this study, which will be conducted entirely in the United States, is the change in absolute forced vital capacity ( FVC ) from baseline to week 52 The TETON 1 study was prompted by data from the INCREASE study, which demonstrated improvements in certain key parameters of lung function in pulmonary hypertension patients with fibrotic lung disease (improved absolute FVC and reduced exacerbations of underlying lung disease). Specifically, in the INCREASE study, treatment with Tyvaso resulted in significant improvements in percent predicted FVC at weeks 8 and 16, with subjects having underlying etiologies of idiopathic interstitial pneumonias (week 8 20%, p=0.0373 and week 16 29%; p=0.0096) and IPF (week 8 25%; p=0.0380 and week 16 35%; p=0.0147) showing the greatest improvement. Consistent positive effects were also observed in patients with chronic hypersensitivity pneumonitis and environmental occupational lung disease. These data points, combined with substantial preclinical evidence of antifibrotic activity of treprostinil, suggest that Tyvaso may offer a treatment option for patients with fibrotic lung disease. In December 2020, the FDA granted orphan designation for treprostinil to treat IPF. We are also in the process of commencing TETON 2 , which is an additional phase 3 study of Tyvaso in IPF that is similar to TETON 1 , but will be conducted outside the United States. 8 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation If Tyvaso DPI is approved and the PERFECT and TETON studies are successful, we also plan to seek FDA approval to expand the Tyvaso ILD label to include PH COPD and IPF, respectively. Tyvaso DPI We have developed a dry powder formulation of inhaled treprostinil called Tyvaso DPI, under an in license from MannKind Corporation ( MannKind ). Tyvaso DPI incorporates the dry powder formulation technology and Dreamboat inhalation device technology used in MannKind Afrezza (insulin human) Inhala tion Powder product, which was approved by the FDA in 2014. If the FDA approves Tyvaso DPI, we believe that this new inhaled trepr ostinil therapy will provide substantial lifestyle benefits to PAH and PH ILD patients, as compared with nebulized Tyvaso Inhalation Solution therapy, because it will be (1) less time consuming to administer and easier to maintain, as the device and drug will be provided in pre filled, single use, disposable cassettes, eliminating the need for cleaning and filling; and (2) mobile and more convenient, as the compact design of the Dreamboat device and drug cassettes used with Tyvaso DPI enables the device to easily fit into the patient pocket and the device does not require electricity to function. We completed 2 clinical studies of Tyvaso DPI. 1 was a study in healthy volunteers, comparing the pharmacokinetics of Tyvaso DPI to Tyvaso Inhalation Solution. We completed the study in October 2020 and announced in January 2021 that the study demonstrated comparable systemic treprostinil exposure between Tyvaso DPI and Tyvaso Inhalation Solution. In December 2020, we completed a clinical study called BREEZE , which evaluated the safety and pharmacokinetics of switching PAH patients from Tyvaso Inhalation Solution to Tyvaso DPI. The BREEZE study demonstrated safety and tolerability of Tyvaso DPI in subjects with PAH transitioning from Tyvaso Inhalation Solution, and comparable systemic treprostinil exposure between Tyvaso DPI and Tyvaso Inhalation Solution. In April 2021, we submitted an NDA to the FDA seeking approval for Tyvaso DPI to treat both PAH and PH ILD. On October 15, 2021, the FDA provided us a complete response letter ( CRL ) in which it declined to approve the Tyvaso DPI NDA. In its complete response, the FDA cited a single deficiency preventing approval of Tyvaso DPI, related to an open inspection issue at a third party analytical testing facility for treprostinil drug substance. The CRL noted, but did not cite as a deficiency, that the FDA had not yet completed its review of a Citizen Petition submitted to the FDA in July 2021 concerning the safety of an excipient in Tyvaso DPI. In December 2021, we resubmitted our NDA to the FDA, addressing the single deficiency cited in the CRL. In January 2022, the FDA accepted our resubmitted NDA for review, and designated our NDA as a class 1 resubmission with an expected 2 month review period ending in February 2022 In February 2022, the FDA requested additional information concerning the pulmonary safety of Tyvaso DPI. We responded to the FDA request, and the FDA indicated that our response constitutes a major amendment to the Tyvaso DPI NDA, which extends the FDA anticipated deadline to review the pending NDA to May 2022 In August 2021 we entered into a commercial supply agreement with MannKind (the Supply Agreement ), which was later amended in October 2021 Pursuant to the Supply Agreement, MannKind is responsible for manufacturing and supplying Tyvaso DPI to us on a cost plus basis. Unless earlier terminated, the initial term of the Supply Agreement continues until December 31, 2031 and will thereafter be renewed automatically for additional, successive 2 year terms unless we give 24 months written notice of non renewal, or MannKind gives 48 months written notice of non renewal, prior to the end of the initial term or any additional renewal term. Each party has customary termination rights, including termination for the other party material breach that is not cured within a specific timeframe or in the event of liquidation, bankruptcy or insolvency of the other party. Ralinepag Ralinepag is a next generation, oral, selective, and potent prostacyclin receptor agonist being developed for treatment of PAH. We are enrolling 2 phase 3 studies of ralinepag (1) ADVANCE OUTCOMES , which is an event driven study of ralinepag in PAH patients with a primary endpoint of time to first clinical worsening event; and (2) ADVANCE CAPACITY , studying the effect of ralinepag on exercise capacity in PAH patients with a primary endpoint of change in peak oxygen uptake via cardiopulmonary exercise test. Both of these studies are global, multi center, placebo controlled trials of patients on approved oral background PAH therapies. Aurora GT We are conducting a clinical study (called SAPPHIRE ) of a gene therapy product called Aurora GT, in which a PAH patient own endothelial progenitor cells are isolated, transfected with the gene for human endothelial nitric oxide synthase, expanded ex vivo , and then delivered back to the same patient. This product is intended to rebuild the blood vessels in the lungs that are compromised by PAH. This study is being conducted in Canada, is intended to be a registration phase study for Canadian regulatory submission, and is sponsored by Northern Therapeutics, Inc., a Canadian entity in which we have a 49.7 percent voting stake and a 718 percent financial stake. We have the exclusive right to pursue this technology in the United States and will evaluate seeking FDA approval of Aurora GT if SAPPHIRE is successful. 2021 Annual Report 9 Organ Manufacturing Each year, end stage organ failure kills millions of people. A significant number of these patients could have benefited from an organ transplant. Unfortunately, the number of usable, donated organs available for transplantation has not grown significantly over the past half century while the need has soared. Our long term goals are aimed at addressing this shortage. With advances in technology, we believe that creating an unlimited supply of tolerable manufactured organs is now principally an engineering challenge, and we are dedicated to finding engineering solutions. We are engaged in research and development of a variety of technologies designed to increase the supply of transplantable organs and tissues and to improve outcomes for transplant recipients through regenerative medicine, 3 D organ bioprinting, xenotransplantation, and ex vivo lung perfusion. In 2019, we entered into a collaboration agreement with the University of Alabama at Birmingham ( UAB ) to develop a pilot scale, designated pathogen free facility to house genetically modified pigs, with a goal of commencing human clinical trials of xenotransplanted kidneys we call UKidneys from pigs to humans in the near term. In August 2020, UAB began to conduct operations at the facility with the first introduction of genetically modified pigs, and in March 2021, the facility received its recertification of compliance from the American Association for Accreditation of Laboratory Animal Care. In 2019, we also entered into and amended agreements with NYU Lang1 Health ( NYU ) and University of Maryland Baltimore, respectively, to conduct preclinical testing of our porcine xenografts, which have been generating data regarding our UKidneys, UThymoKidneys , and UHearts . While we continue to develop and commercialize therapies for rare and life threatening conditions, we view organ manufacturing as a complementary solution for a broad array of diseases, many of which (such as PAH) have proven incurable to date through more traditional pharmaceutical and biologic therapies. For this reason, in 2015 we created a wholly owned PBC called Lung Biotechnology PBC, chartered with the express purpose of address[ing] the acute national shortage of transplantable lungs and other organs with a variety of technologies that either delay the need for such organs or expand the supply. It is also why we included the development of technologies that expand the availability of transplantable organs as part of our express public benefit purpose when we converted United Therapeutics to a PBC in 2021 Recently, we announced several key achievements in our organ manufacturing program First Successful Xenotransplantation of a Porcine Heart In January 2022, University of Maryland School of Medicine surgeons successfully transplanted an experimental, genetically modified UHeart into a living human under an expanded access authorization by the FDA. Successful UKidney Tests in Preclinical Human Models In September 2021, collaborators at NYU and UAB tested UThymoKidneys and UKidneys from our genetically modified pigs in brain dead organ donors, providing preclinical evidence that genetically modified pig organs could transcend the most proximate immunological barriers to xenotransplantation. Results of the UAB experiment were published in the American Journal of Transplantation in January 2022 Ex Vivo Lung Perfusion In January 2022, we announced that more than 200 patients had received lung transplants following use of our centralized ex vivo lung perfusion service. Ex vivo lung perfusion technology increases the number of transplantable lungs by giving surgeons the ability to assess the function of marginal lungs to determine if the lungs are suitable for transplantation. This allows for the use of lungs that would have otherwise not been transplanted. Dr1 Delivery of Organs In October 2021, we successfully completed the first ever delivery of a lung for transplant at Toronto General Hospital, demonstrating the feasibility of our goal of delivering our manufactured organs with zero carbon footprint aircraft. Discontinued Programs Trevyent . In August 2018, we acquired SteadyMed Ltd. ( SteadyMed ), which was developing Trevyent, a drug device combination product for delivery of subcutaneous treprostinil. Following our acquisition of SteadyMed, we submitted an NDA for Trevyent to the FDA in June 2019. In April 2020, the FDA issued us a CRL declining to approve the NDA. Following the CRL, additional comments provided by the FDA indicated that we would need to both redesign the product to improve pump accuracy in certain respects and conduct a clinical study of the redesigned product. These additional steps would have caused considerable additional delay, and additional development efforts may not ultimately have been successful in addressing the FDA comments. We decided that continued development of Trevyent was no longer commercially reasonable in light of this additional FDA feedback, and discontinued our efforts to develop the product for the U.S. market. 10 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation Implantable System for Remodulin . On June 22, 2021, we and Medtronic, Inc. ( Medtronic ) agreed to discontinue further efforts to develop and commercialize the Implantable System for Remodulin ( ISR ). As background, we had been collaborating with Medtronic since 2009 to develop the ISR to deliver Remodulin for patients with PAH via an implantable system developed by Medtronic. On February 25, 2019, we entered into a Commercialization Agreement with Medtronic governing the parties collaboration to commercialize the ISR in the United States (the Commercialization Agreement ). Despite FDA approval of Medtronic premarket approval application ( PMA ) for the ISR in December 2017, commercial launch of the product required Medtronic, as the applicant, to satisfy certain conditions to its PMA approval. Based on the evolution of treatment options and paradigms in PAH over the past few years, and the anticipated efforts required to satisfy the FDA conditions of approval, we and Medtronic decided to discontinue further efforts to develop and commercialize the ISR. We are working with Medtronic on a mutually agreed approach to wind down the development program, and to support patients already enrolled in clinical studies of the ISR, at our sole expense. Effective June 22, 2021, the parties mutually agreed to terminate the Commercialization Agreement. OreniPro . In February 2022, we discontinued the development of the oral prodrug version of Orenitram we called OreniPro, as a result of recent pharmacokinetic analyses suggesting that OreniPro dosing schedule would be similar to that of Orenitram. Sales and Marketing Our marketing strategy for our commercial PAH and PH ILD products is to use our sales and marketing teams to reach out to the prescriber community to (1) increase PAH and PH ILD awareness; (2) increase understanding of the progressive nature of PAH and the importance of early treatment; and (3) increase awareness of our commercial products and how they fit into the various stages of disease progression and treatment. Distribution of Commercial Products United States Distribution of Tyvaso, Remodulin, Remunity Pump, Orenitram, and Unituxin We distribute Tyvaso, Remodulin, the Remunity Pump, and Orenitram throughout the United States through 2 contracted specialty pharmaceutical distributors Accredo Health Group, Inc. and its affiliates ( Accredo ) and Caremark, L.L.C. ( CVS Specialty ). Assuming FDA approval, we pl an to distribute Tyvaso DPI through these same distributors. T hese distributors are required to maintain certain minimum inventory levels in order to ensure an uninterrupted supply to patients who are prescribed our therapies. We compensate Accredo and CVS Specialty on a fee for service basis for certain ancillary services in connection with the distribution of these products. If any of our distribution agreements expire or terminate, we may, under certain circumstances, be required to repurchase any unsold inventory held by our distributors. These specialty pharmaceutical distributors are responsible for assisting patients with obtaining reimbursement for the cost of our treprostinil based products and providing other support services. Under our distribution agreements, we sell each of our treprostinil based products to these distributors at a transfer price that we establish. We have also established patient assistance programs in the United States, which provide our treprostinil based products to eligible uninsured or under insured patients at no charge. Accredo and CVS Specialty assist us with the administration of these programs. We distribute Unituxin throughout the United States through an exclusive distribution agreement with ASD Specialty Healthcare, Inc. ( ASD ), an affiliate of AmerisourceBergen Corporation. Under this agreement, we sell Unituxin to ASD at a transfer price that we establish, and we pay ASD fees for services provided in connection with the distribution and support of Unituxin. To the extent we increase the price of any of these products, increases are typically in the single digit percentages per year. United States Distribution of Adcirca Under our manufacturing and supply agreement with Lilly, Lilly manufactures and distributes Adcirca on our behalf through its wholesaler ne2rk in the same manner that it distributes its own pharmaceutical products. Under the terms of this agreement, we take title to Adcirca upon completion of its manufacture by Lilly. Adcirca is shipped to customers in accordance with purchase orders received by Lilly. Upon shipment, Lilly sends an invoice and collects the amount due from the customer subject to customary discounts and rebates, if any. Although Lilly provides these services on our behalf, we maintain the risk of loss as it pertains to inventory, product returns, and non payment of invoices. The manufacturing and supply agreement will continue in effect until the December 31, 2023 expiration or earlier termination of our license agreement for Adcirca. Lilly retains authority under the license agreement for all regulatory activities with respect to Adcirca, as well as its retail pricing, which has been and is expected to remain at price parity with Cialis. We have also established a patient assistance program in the United States, which provides Adcirca to eligible uninsured or under insured patients at no charge. 2021 Annual Report 11 International Distribution of Tyvaso, Remodulin, Orenitram, and Unituxin We currently sell Remodulin outside the United States to various distributors, each of which has exclusive distribution rights in 1 or more countries within Europe, the Middle East, Asia, and South and Central America. Our primary distributor outside the United States is Grupo Ferrer Internacional, S.A. ( Ferrer ), which holds Remodulin marketing authorization rights in many of these territories. We sell Tyvaso commercially to distributors that have exclusive distribution rights in Israel and Argentina. We also distribute Remodulin and Unituxin in Canada through a specialty pharmaceutical wholesaler. In some of the markets where we are not licensed to market Remodulin, such as Turkey, Taiwan, and the United Kingdom, Remodulin is available, but not marketed, on a named patient basis in which therapies are approved for individual patients by a national medical review board, hospital, or health plan on a case by case basis. Similar named patient programs are also available for Tyvaso in certain countries. In November 2020, we entered into an exclusive agreement with Ferrer to distribute Orenitram throughout the territories where it also has distribution rights for Remodulin. Ferrer plans to submit a Marketing Authorization Application for Orenitram to the European Medicines Agency ( EMA ) in 2022 In December 2021, we entered into an exclusive agreement with Ferrer to distribute Tyvaso throughout the territories where it also has distribution rights for Remodulin. Ferrer plans to seek marketing authorization approval for Tyvaso to treat PH ILD in Europe and several other territories. We distribute Unituxin in Japan through a third party distributor that obtained Japanese marketing authorization during the second quarter of 2021 Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Our success depends in part on our ability to obtain and maintain patent protection for our products, preserve trade secrets, prevent third parties from infringing upon our proprietary rights, and operate without infringing upon the proprietary rights of others in the United States and worldwide. Many of these proprietary rights stem from licenses and other strategic relationships with third parties. In addition to intellectual property rights, U.S. and international regulatory authorities often provide periods of market exclusivity for manufacturers of biopharmaceutical products. Patents provide the owner with a right to exclude others from practicing an invention. Patents may cover the active ingredients, uses, formulations, doses, administrations, delivery mechanisms, manufacturing processes, and other aspects of a product. The period of patent protection for any given product generally depends on the expiration date of various patents and may differ from country to country according to the type of patents, the scope of coverage, and the remedies for infringement available in a country. Most of our commercial products and investigational products are protected by patents that expire on varying dates. Significant legal questions exist concerning the extent and scope of patent protection for biopharmaceutical products and processes in the United States and elsewhere. Accordingly, there is no certainty that patent applications owned or licensed by us will be issued as patents, or that our issued patents will afford meaningful protection against competitors. Once issued, patents are subject to challenge through both administrative and judicial proceedings in the United States and other countries. Such proceedings include re examinations, inter partes reviews ( IPR ), post grant reviews, and interference proceedings before the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, as well as opposition proceedings before the European Patent Office. Litigation may be required to enforce, defend, or obtain our patent and other intellectual property rights. Any administrative proceeding or litigation could require a significant commitment of our resources and, depending on outcome, could adversely affect the scope, validity, or enforceability of certain of our patent or other proprietary rights. Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram Proprietary Rights We have a number of issued patents and pending patent applications covering our treprostinil based products, Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram. We have been granted 2 patents related to manufacturing treprostinil that expire in 2028 and are listed in the FDA Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations, commonly known as the Orange Book (see Orange Book below), for Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram. Both of these patents are subject to the IPR proceedings discussed below under Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights . In addition to the treprostinil patents noted above, we have other patents specific to our individual treprostinil based products, including the following Tyvaso. We have been granted 2 patents directed to a method of treating pulmonary hypertension and a kit for treating pulmonary hypertension. These 2 patents expire in 2028 and are listed in the Orange Book. Counterparts to these 2 patents are issued in several other countries. We have also been granted 2 patents on methods of treating pulmonary hypertension by administering treprostinil by inhalation, which expire in 2024. These 2 patents are also listed in the Orange Book. Remodulin . We have been granted 3 U.S. patents covering an improved diluent for Remodulin, which expire in 2028 and 2029. We have another patent covering intravenous administration of Remodulin with certain diluents, which expires in 2024. We have been granted 2 patents covering a treprostinil formulation with a citrate buffer, which expire in 2024. We have been granted another patent covering a method of treating pulmonary hypertension by administering treprostinil at a certain rate intravenously, which expires in 2024. All seven of these patents are listed in the Orange Book. 12 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation Orenitram . Our patents for Orenitram cover methods of use for treating PAH, orally administered formulations, controlled moisture storage and manufacturing methods, as well as those covering controlled release formulations licensed to us by Supernus Pharmaceuticals Inc. ( Supernus ). These patents will expire in the United States between 2024 and 2031 and in various countries throughout the world between 2024 and 2030. We have additional pending U.S. and international patent applications related to Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram. Orange Book In seeking approval of a drug through an NDA or upon issuance of new patents following approval of an NDA, applicants are required to submit to the FDA each patent that has claims covering the applicant product or a method of using the product. Each of the patents submitted is then published in the Orange Book. See Governmental Regulation Patent Term and Regulatory Exclusivity below for further details. Remodulin currently has nine unexpired Orange Book listed patents with expiration dates ranging from 2024 to 2029. Tyvaso currently has six unexpired Orange Book listed patents expiring in 2028. Orenitram currently has twelve unexpired Orange Book listed patents with expiration dates ranging from 2024 to 2031 Additional patent applications are pending, and if granted, may be eligible for listing in the Orange Book. Regulatory Exclusivity Tyvaso. In 2010, the FDA granted orphan drug designation for Tyvaso, which resulted in an orphan exclusivity period that expired in July 2016. In March 2021, the FDA granted Tyvaso 3 year clinical trial exclusivity for PH ILD as a result of the INCREASE study and the expansion of the Tyvaso label to include a PH ILD indication. This exclusivity period will extend through March 202 4, and will also cover Tyvaso DPI if it is approved for PH ILD. In 2004, the European Commission designated Tyvaso an orphan medicinal product for treatment of both PAH and chronic thromboembolic pulmonary hypertension, which would confer a ten year exclusivity period commencing if and when we obtain marketing approval. In December 2020, the FDA granted orphan designation for treprostinil for treatment of IPF. Thus, if our TETON studies are successful and the FDA approves our supplemental NDA to update the Tyvaso labeling to include an IPF indication, the FDA should grant seven year orphan drug exclusivity for the new indication. Remodulin. Regulatory exclusivity for Remodulin in the United States and Europe has expired. Orenitram. In November 2019, following approval of our supplemental NDA to reflect the FREEDOM EV results in the Orenitram label, the FDA granted orphan exclusivity for the new indication that Orenitram delays disease progression in PAH patients. This exclusivity expires in October 2026. Supernus License In 2006, we entered into an exclusive license agreement with Supernus to use certain of its technologies in manufacturing Orenitram. Under the agreement, we paid Supernus certain amounts upon the achievement of specified milest1s based on the development and commercial launch of Orenitram for PAH, and we would be obligated to make additional milest1 payments if we develop Orenitram for a second indication. In addition, the agreement provides that we will pay a single digit percentage royalty based on net worldwide sales. The term of this royalty expires during the second quarter of 2026. Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights Remodulin Generic Competition We settled litigation with Sandoz, Inc. ( Sandoz ) related to its ANDA seeking FDA approval to market a generic version of Remodulin and in March 2019, Sandoz announced the availability of its generic product in the United States. We have also entered into similar settlement agreements with other generic companies, some of which have also launched sales of generic versions of Remodulin. Through December 31, 2021, we have seen minimal erosion of Remodulin sales as a result of generic treprostinil competition in the United States. We are currently engaged in litigation with Sandoz and its marketing partner, RareGen, a subsidiary of Liquidia Corporation ( Liquidia ), related to the infusion devices used to deliver Remodulin subcutaneously. We understand that generic treprostinil was initially launched by Sandoz RareGen for use only by intravenous administration. In May 2021, Liquidia announced that Sandoz generic treprostinil has been made available for subcutaneous use, following FDA clearance of a cartridge that can deliver the product via the Smiths Medical MS 3 pump. See Note 14 Litigation, to our consolidated financial statements included in this Report. Regulatory authorities in various European countries began approving generic versions of Remodulin in 2018, followed by pricing approvals and launches in most of these countries in 2019 and 2020. As a result, our international Remodulin revenues have come under pressure due to increased competition and a reduction in our contractual transfer price for Remodulin sold by certain international distributors for sales in countries in which the pricing of Remodulin is impacted by the generic competition. Tyvaso and Orenitram Potential Future Generic Competition We also settled litigation with Watson and Actavis related to their ANDAs seeking FDA approval to market generic versions of Tyvaso and Orenitram, respectively, before the expiration of certain of our U.S. patents. Under the settlement agreements, Watson and Actavis can market their generic versions of Tyvaso and Orenitram in the United States beginning in January 2026 2021 Annual Report 13 and June 2027, respectively, although they may be permitted to enter the market earlier under certain circumstances. Competition from these generic companies could reduce our net product sales and profits. We recently filed a patent infringement action against ANI based on its ANDA seeking FDA approval to market a generic version of Orenitram. The litigation is in its very early stages, with trial set for May 2023 If ANI is successful in the pending litigation, it could accelerate the launch of generic competition for Orenitram, which could reduce our net product sales and profits. See Note 14 Litigation, to our consolidated financial statements included in this Report. Liquidia Yutrepia We are engaged in patent litigation with Liquidia concerning 3 patents related to Tyvaso. The litigation is proceeding in parallel in 2 fora (1) federal district court; and (2) the Patent Trial and Appeal Board ( PTAB ) of the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office. As background, in January 2020 Liquidia submitted its initial NDA to the FDA for approval of Yutrepia (formerly known as LIQ861), a dry powder formulation of treprostinil for inhalation. The Yutrepia NDA was submitted under the 505(b)(2) regulatory pathway with Tyvaso as the reference listed drug, and received tentative approval from the FDA in November 2021 If and when Liquidia launches Yutrepia, it would compete directly with Tyvaso, Tyvaso DPI (if approved), and our other treprostinil based products. Following the initial submission of the Yutrepia NDA, we filed a lawsuit in federal district court against Liquidia for infringement of 3 of our patents. As a result, the FDA is automatically precluded from granting final approval of Liquidia NDA for up to 30 months (a period that expires in October 2022) or until final judgment is issued in the district court litigation, whichever occurs first. Liquidia contends that each asserted claim of these 3 patents is invalid and or not infringed by Yutrepia. Trial is scheduled for March 2022 Separately, Liquidia has been attempting to invalidate these patents by filing petitions for IPR with the PTAB. Challengers in IPR proceedings have a lower burden of proof (preponderance of the evidence) relative to district court litigation (clear and convincing evidence) to successfully challenge the validity of patent claims. The PTAB refused to institute 1 of the IPRs, and the other 2 are proceeding on separate timelines U.S. Patent No. 9,593,066 In October 2020, the PTAB declined to institute IPR proceedings relating to this patent because Liquidia failed to establish a reasonable likelihood of prevailing on any claim of this patent. U.S. Patent No. 9,604,901 In October 2021, the PTAB issued a final written decision on Liquidia IPR relating to this patent. The PTAB upheld the patentability of 2 of the claims of this patent, 1 of which was being asserted against Liquidia in the district court litigation, and found that seven other claims of this patent were unpatentable. All claims of this patent remain valid until any IPR appeals are exhausted. In December 2021, we filed a stipulation in the district court litigation that the 901 patent is not infringed by Liquidia based on the court claim construction ruling. That stipulation is subject to our right to appeal the court claim construction at the appropriate time. U.S. Patent No. 10,716,793 In August 2021, the PTAB instituted IPR proceedings related to this patent. The PTAB has until August 2022 to issue a final written decision regarding this IPR. In order to prevail in our district court litigation against Liquidia, we need a judgment that at least 1 of the claims of at least 1 of these patents is not invalid and is infringed by Yutrepia. We must prove infringement by a preponderance of the evidence, and in order for Liquidia to prevail on its invalidity defense, it must prove invalidity by clear and convincing evidence. For further details, please see Note 14 Litigation , to our consolidated financial statements. Adcirca Generic Competition A U.S. patent for Adcirca for treatment of pulmonary hypertension expired in November 2017, and FDA conferred regulatory exclusivity expired in May 2018, leading to the launch of a generic version of Adcirca by Mylan N.V. in August 2018, and by additional companies in February 2019. Generic competition for Adcirca has had a material adverse impact on Adcirca net product sales. General We intend to vigorously enforce our intellectual property rights related to our products. However, we cannot assure you that we will prevail in defending our patent rights, or that additional challenges from other ANDA filers or other challengers will not surface with respect to our products. Our patents could be invalidated, found unenforceable, or found not to cover 1 or more generic forms of our products. If any ANDA filer or filer of a 505(b)(2) NDA for a branded treprostinil product were to receive approval to sell its treprostinil product and or prevail in any patent litigation, our affected product(s) would become subject to increased competition. Patent expiration, patent litigation, and competition from generic or other branded treprostinil manufacturers could have a significant, adverse impact on our treprostinil based product revenues including the anticipated revenues from new products such as Tyvaso DPI our profits, and our stock price. These potential effects are inherently difficult to predict. For additional discussion, refer to the risk factor entitled, Our intellectual property rights may not effectively deter competitors from developing competing products that, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our revenues and profit s, contained in , Item 1A Risk Factors included in this Report. 14 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation Adcirca License Agreement In 2008, Lilly granted us an exclusive license to develop, market, promote, and commercialize Adcirca for treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States. We agreed to pay Lilly royalties based on our net product sales of Adcirca. Lilly retained the exclusive rights to develop, manufacture, and commercialize pharmaceutical products containing tadalafil, the active pharmaceutical ingredient in Adcirca, for treatment of pulmonary hypertension outside of the United States and for treatment of other diseases worldwide. Lilly retained authority for all regulatory activities with respect to Adcirca and for setting the wholesale price of Adcirca, which has been and is expected to continue to be at price parity with Cialis. In May 2017, we amended our Adcirca license agreement with Lilly in order to clarify and extend the term of the agreement and to amend the economic terms of the agreement following a patent expiry in November 2017. As a result, we are required to make milest1 payments to Lilly equal to $325,000 for each $10 million in net product sales, plus a royalty equal to ten percent of our net product sales. In June 2020, we amended our Adcirca license agreement to extend its term through December 31, 2023 Previously, the agreement was scheduled to expire at the end of 2020. Following expiration, we will remain obligated to refund the purchase price of any Adcirca that we previously sold to distributors that expires unsold. For additional discussion, refer to our Adcirca product description contained in , Item 1 Business Overview Products to Treat Pulmonary Arterial Hypertension. We also agreed to purchase Adcirca at a fixed manufacturing cost. The agreement provides a mechanism, generally related to the increase in the national cost of pharmaceutical manufacturing, pursuant to which Lilly may raise the manufacturing cost of Adcirca. Unituxin Proprietary Rights and Regulatory Exclusivity We have orphan drug exclusivity in the United States for Unituxin, expiring March 2022, which precludes the FDA from approving any application to market the same drug for the same indication, except in limited circumstances. In addition, approval of our BLA conferred a 12 year data exclusivity period through March 2027, during which the FDA may not approve a biosimilar for Unituxin. Under a non exclusive license agreement with The Scripps Research Institute, we pay a royalty of 1 percent of Unituxin net sales. We have no patents covering Unituxin. DEKA Agreements In December 2014, we entered into an exclusive agreement with DEKA to develop a pre filled, semi disposable system for subcutaneous delivery of Remodulin, which we refer to as the Remunity Pump. Our agreement with DEKA expires on the last to occur of 25 years from the first product launch under the agreement, or upon the expiration of the last valid claim of a patent licensed from DEKA under the agreement that covers the Remunity Pump. Under the terms of the agreement, we funded the development costs related to the Remunity Pump, and will continue to fund further development costs associated with new versions of the pump. We will pay product fees and a single digit royalty to DEKA based on commercial sales of the Remunity Pump and the Remodulin drug product sold for use with the system. Either party may terminate the agreement immediately upon a material breach by the other party that is uncured following the relevant cure period, or in the event of the other party bankruptcy or insolvency. In November 2019, we entered into a supply agreement with an affiliate of DEKA to manufacture and supply the Remunity Pump. Under this supply agreement, we are responsible for all costs associated with manufacturing the Remunity Pump. The Remunity Pump is covered by issued patents and pending patent applications both in the U.S. and other countries. The expiration dates of currently issued U.S. patents range from 2027 through 2033 Tyvaso DPI and the MannKind Agreement In September 2018, we entered into a worldwide, exclusive license and collaboration agreement with MannKind for the development and commercialization of Tyvaso DPI for treatment of PAH. The agreement became effective on October 15, 2018. Under our agreement with MannKind, we are responsible for global development, regulatory, and commercial activities related to Tyvaso DPI, and we share manufacturing responsibilities with MannKind. Under the terms of the agreement, we paid MannKind $45.0 million following the effectiveness of the agreement in October 2018, and we paid $25.0 million in each of 2019 and 2020 following the achievement of specific development targets. MannKind is also entitled to receive low double digit royalties on our net sales of the product. In addition, we have the option, in our sole discretion, to expand the license to include other active ingredients for treatment of pulmonary hypertension. We will pay MannKind up to $40.0 million in additional option exercise and development milest1 payments for each product (if any) added to the license pursuant to this option, as well as a low double digit royalty on our net sales of any such product. Under our license agreement with MannKind, we have an exclusive license to a variety of granted and pending patents and patent applications related to treprostinil inhalation powder and the Dreamboat device, including multiple patent families covering the U.S. and other major market countries. These patents cover drug formulation, devices and device comp1nts, and manufacturing processes and intermediates. Expiration dates for issued patents range from the mid 2020s to the mid 2030s. Additional patents subject to pending patent applications, if issued, would have expiration dates in the late 2030s. We believe that certain of the issued and pending patents (if issued) we license from MannKind would be eligible for listing in the Orange Book for Tyvaso DPI. 2021 Annual Report 15 Ralinepag and the Arena Agreement On November 15, 2018, we entered into an exclusive license agreement with Arena Pharmaceuticals, Inc. ( Arena ) related to ralinepag. On January 24, 2019, in connection with the closing of the transactions contemplated by the license agreement (1) Arena granted to us perpetual, irrevocable, and exclusive rights throughout the universe to develop, manufacture, and commercialize ralinepag; (2) Arena transferred to us certain other assets related to ralinepag, including, among others, related domain names and trademarks, permits, certain contracts, inventory, regulatory documentation, Investigational New Drug ( IND ) Application No. 109021 (related to ralinepag), and non clinical, preclinical, and clinical trial data; (3) we assumed certain limited liabilities from Arena, including, among others, all obligations arising after the closing under the assumed contracts and the IND described above; and (4) we paid Arena $800.0 million, which we expensed as acquired in process research and development and included within research and development expenses in our consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2019. We will also pay Arena (1) a 1 time payment of $250.0 million for the first, if any, marketing approval we receive in the United States for an inhaled version of ralinepag to treat PAH; (2) a 1 time payment of $150.0 million for the first, if any, marketing approval we receive in any of Japan, France, Italy, the United Kingdom, Spain, or Germany for an oral version of ralinepag to treat any indication; and (3) low double digit, tiered royalties on net sales of any pharmaceutical product containing ralinepag as an active ingredient, subject to certain adjustments for third party license payments. Under our license agreement with Arena, we have an exclusive license to a variety of granted and pending patents and applications related to ralinepag covering drug formulation, manufacturing and dosage, among others. Many of these patents and patent applications would be eligible for listing in the Orange Book. Based on potential patent term extensions and additional patent filings, we believe that U.S. patent protection for ralinepag will likely last through at least the mid 2030s. Other We are party to various other license agreements related to therapies and technologies under development. These license agreements require us to make payments based on a percentage of sales if we are successful in commercially developing these therapies, and may require other payments upon the achievement of certain milest1s. Manufacturing and Supply We manufacture our primary supply of Tyvaso, Remodulin, Orenitram, and Unituxin at our own facilities. In particular, we synthesize treprostinil, the active ingredient in Tyvaso and Remodulin, and treprostinil diolamine, the active ingredient in Orenitram, at our facility in Silver Spring, Maryland. We produce dinutuximab, the active ingredient in Unituxin, at our Silver Spring facility. We manufacture Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Unituxin drug product at our Silver Spring facility. We manufacture Orenitram drug product and we package, warehouse, and distribute Tyvaso, Remodulin, Orenitram, and Unituxin at our facility in Research Triangle Park, North Carolina. We maintain, at a minimum, a 2 year inventory of Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram based on expected demand, and we contract with third party contract manufacturers to supplement our capacity for some products, in order to mitigate the risk that we might not be able to manufacture internally sufficient quantities to meet patient demand. For example, Baxter Pharmaceutical Solutions, LLC is approved by the FDA, the EMA, and various other international regulatory agencies to manufacture Remodulin for us. We rely on Woodstock Sterile Solutions to serve as an additional manufacturer of Tyvaso, and we rely entirely on Minnetronix Inc. to manufacture the nebulizer used in our Tyvaso Inhalation System. We have no plans to develop a redundant manufacturing source for dinutuximab, the active ingredient in Unituxin, or for finished Unituxin or Orenitram drug product. DEKA and its affiliates are currently entirely responsible for manufacturing the Remunity Pump. MannKind is the sole manufacturer of Tyvaso DPI. We currently rely on third party contract manufacturers to produce ralinepag. Although we believe that additional third parties could provide similar products, services, and materials, there are few companies that could replace our existing third party manufacturers and suppliers. A change in supplier or manufacturer could cause a delay in the manufacturing, distribution and research efforts associated with our respective products or result in increased costs. See also Item 1A Risk Factors included in this Report. Competition Many drug companies engage in research, development, and commercialization of products to treat cardiopulmonary diseases and cancer. For treatment of PAH, we compete with many approved products in the United States and the rest of the world, including the following Generic treprostinil and generic tadalafil . These products have been available in the United States since 2019 and 2018, respectively, as discussed above under Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition. 16 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation Flolan, Veletri, and generic epoprostenol. Flolan (epoprostenol) is a prostacyclin that is delivered by intravenous infusion. GlaxoSmithKline ( Glaxo ) began marketing Flolan in the United States in 1996. In 2008, the FDA approved generic epoprostenol for treatment of PAH. In 2010, Actelion Limited ( Actelion ) (which was acquired by Johnson & Johnson in 2017) commenced sales of Veletri, which is another version of intravenous epoprostenol. Tracleer and generic bosentan . Tracleer (bosentan), an oral ETRA therapy for treatment of PAH, was approved in 2001 in the United States and in 2002 in Europe. Tracleer is marketed worldwide by Actelion. Generic bosentan became available in the United States in 2019 and is also available in other countries. Ventavis and Ilomedin . Approved in 2004 in the United States and in 2003 in Europe, Ventavis (iloprost) is an inhaled prostacyclin analogue. Ventavis is currently marketed by Actelion in the United States and by Bayer Schering Pharma AG ( Bayer ) in Europe. Iloprost is also marketed by Bayer in certain countries outside the United States in an intravenous form known as Ilomedin. Revatio and generic sildenafil citrate. Approved in 2005 in the United States, Revatio (sildenafil citrate) is an oral PDE 5 inhibitor therapy manufactured by Pfizer Inc. Revatio contains sildenafil citrate, the same active ingredient as Viagra . In 2012, several companies began marketing generic formulations of sildenafil citrate. Letairis and generic ambrisentan. Approved in 2007 in the United States, Letairis (ambrisentan) is an oral ETRA therapy marketed by Gilead Sciences, Inc. ( Gilead ) for treatment of PAH. In 2008, Glaxo received marketing authorization from the EMA for Letairis in Europe, where it is known as Volibris . In 2015, Gilead announced the positive results of the AMBITION study of ambrisentan and tadalafil as an up front combination therapy for PAH, which we believe has driven increased use of ambrisentan and tadalafil. Generic ambrisentan became available in the United States in 2019. Opsumit . Approved in 2013 in both the United States and in the EU, Opsumit (macitentan) is an oral ETRA therapy marketed by Actelion for treatment of PAH. Adempas . Approved in 2013 in the United States and 2014 in the EU, Adempas (riociguat) is an sGC stimulator, which targets a similar vasodilatory pathway as PDE 5 inhibitors and is approved for chronic thromboembolic pulmonary hypertension and PAH. Adempas is an oral therapy marketed by Bayer. Uptravi . Approved in the United States in December 2015 and by the EMA in May 2016, Uptravi (selexipag) is an oral IP prostacyclin receptor agonist marketed by Actelion. Actelion also has applications pending in various other jurisdictions. Uptravi is also marketed in Japan by Nippon Shinyaku Co., Ltd. There are also a variety of investigational PAH therapies in the later stages of development, including the following Yutrepia, a dry powder formulation of treprostinil designed for deep lung delivery using a disposable inhaler being developed by Liquidia. In November 2021, Liquidia announced the FDA granted tentative approval for its NDA for Yutrepia to treat PAH, with final approval pending resolution of the regulatory stay triggered by the litigation described above under Patent and Other Property Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights. In late 2020, Liquidia completed a business combination with RareGen, LLC, which markets a generic version of Remodulin. Liquidia has indicated that it plans to seek approval to expand Yutrepia label to include PH ILD, following expiration of Tyvaso regulatory exclusivity in that indication in March 2024. Sotatercept , an injected TGF beta modulator being developed by Acceleron Pharma, Inc. ( Acceleron ), which was acquired by Merck & Co., Inc. in November 2021 Acceleron announced the successful completion of a phase 2 study in PAH patients in January 2020. A phase 3, registration trial called STELLAR was initiated in December 2020, and 3 additional phase 3 studies have begun. Acceleron has indicated it may also study sotatercept in PH ILD. Imatinib , a drug currently used to treat cancer under the trade name Gleevec , is being developed for treatment of PAH by 3 companies. Tenax Therapeutics, Inc. announced plans to initiate a phase 3 study of an oral formulation during 2022 Aerovate Therapeutics, Inc. announced it initiated a phase 2 3 clinical study of an inhaled formulation of imatinib. Aerami Therapeutics Holdings, Inc. is conducting a phase 1 trial of an inhaled formulation of imatinib, and has announced plans to initiate a phase 2 3 trial in early 2022 TPIP (NS1009), a treprostinil palmitil inhalation (dry powder nanoparticle formulation of a treprostinil prodrug) being developed by Insmed Incorporated ( Insmed ) for PAH. TPIP is currently undergoing phase 2 studies in PAH patients, and Insmed has announced plans to commence studies in PH ILD and IPF patients. L606 , an inhaled, liposomal form of treprostinil being developed by Pharmosa Biopharm Inc. ( Pharmosa ) for PAH, which completed a phase 1 study in healthy volunteers. Pharmosa initiated a phase 3 study in August 2021 Pemziviptadil (PB1046) , a subcutaneously injected, sustained release analogue of the native human vasoactive intestinal peptide, which is being developed by PhaseBio Pharmaceuticals, Inc. ( PhaseBio ). In December 2021, PhaseBio announced discontinuation of its phase 2 study in PAH patients due to the impact of the COVID 19 pandemic on manufacturing, associated drug supply, and the rate of enrollment in the study. Rodatristat ethyl (RVT 1201) , a tryptophan hydroxylase inhibitor being developed by Altavant Sciences, Inc. ( Altavant ), a wholly owned subsidiary of Sumitovant Biopharma Ltd., to treat PAH. Altavant is conducting a phase 2 clinical study in PAH patients, and is conducting phase 1 studies for IPF. Seralutinib (GB002) , an inhaled PDGF receptor kinase inhibitor being developed by Gossamer Bio, Inc. to treat PAH. 2 phase 2 clinical studies are ongoing. 2021 Annual Report 17 TIVUS , an ultrasound catheter system being developed by SoniVie for treatment of denervation associated with PAH, has underg1 phase 1 trials in PAH patients. A pivotal trial is ongoing. MK 5475 , an inhaled once daily sGC stimulant being developed by Merck Sharpe & Dohme Corp. for PAH (phase 2 3) and PH COPD (phase 1). Zamicastat (BIA 5 1058) , an oral potent and selective dopamine beta hydroxylase inhibitor being developed by Bial Portela C.S.A., for PAH. A Phase 2 study was completed in October 2021 Oral non prostacyclin therapies (such as PDE 5 inhibitors and ETRAs) are commonly prescribed as first line treatments for the least severely ill PAH patients (functional class II patients). As patients progress in their disease severity (functional classes III and IV), more advanced approved therapies, such as inhaled prostacyclin analogues (such as Tyvaso) or infused prostacyclin analogues (such as Remodulin) are then commonly added. Orenitram was the first approved oral prostacyclin class therapy for PAH in the United States, and offers a more convenient alternative therapy to Remodulin and Tyvaso. The use of available oral therapies could delay many patients need for inhaled or infused prostacyclin therapy. As a result, the availability of oral therapies affects demand for our inhaled and infused products. Orenitram faces direct competition from Uptravi, which is indicated to delay disease progression and reduce the risk of hospitalization for PAH. Orenitram initial indication was limited to the improvement of exercise capacity, which may have led physicians to prescribe Uptravi instead of Orenitram. As noted above, however, Uptravi is an oral IP prostacyclin receptor agonist. While prostacyclin analogues such as Orenitram broadly mimic the effect of prostacyclin, IP prostacyclin receptor agonists bind selectively to the IP receptor, 1 of several prostacyclin receptors. In addition, Orenitram label allows physicians flexibility to titrate each patient dosing up to a level according to tolerability, without any stated maximum. By contrast, Uptravi label limits uptitration to a specific maximum dose. Given the progressive nature of PAH, we believe that many patients will initiate Orenitram or another 1 of our treprostinil based therapies after their disease progresses on Uptravi. In August 2018, we announced the results of our FREEDOM EV clinical study, which demonstrated that Orenitram delays time to clinical worsening, demonstrated improvement across key clinical measures, and, at study closure, indicated a positive impact on survival rates. In October 2019, the FDA approved a supplement to our Orenitram NDA expanding the Orenitram label to indicate that it also delays disease progression, in addition to improving exercise capacity. We believe that these clinical results and updated labeling have resulted in increased use of Orenitram. We have faced generic competition for Adcirca since the launch of generic tadalafil in the United States in August 2018, which has significantly reduced our Adcirca revenues. We have also faced generic competition for Remodulin in the United States and certain European countries since 2019. Finally, we have entered into settlement agreements with Actavis and Watson, permitting them to launch generic versions of Orenitram and Tyvaso in June 2027 and January 2026, respectively, or earlier under certain circumstances. For details regarding these and other potential generic competitors, see the section above entitled Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights . Tyvaso, Tyvaso DPI (if approved), and our other treprostinil based products may face competition from Liquidia if it obtains final approval of Yutrepia, a dry powder inhaled version of treprostinil. Aside from Tyvaso, there are no approved therapies to treat PH ILD. No therapy is approved to treat PH COPD. We plan to pursue a PH COPD indication for Tyvaso and Tyvaso DPI (if approved), assuming our PERFECT study is successful. As noted above, several PAH drug candidates may also be developed for PH ILD or PH COPD ( e.g., Yutrepia, sotatercept, MK 5476, and TPIP). Other companies are now developing, or may in the future develop, therapies to treat WHO Group 3 pulmonary hypertension, including INOpulse , an inhaled nitric oxide delivery system being developed by Bellerophon Therapeutics, Inc. for fibrotic interstitial lung disease ( fILD ) patients at risk of pulmonary hypertension, as well as pulmonary hypertension associated with other indications such as COPD and sarcoidosis. A phase 3 study in fILD is ongoing. In addition, the use of antifibrotic therapies to treat underlying lung disease (such as the IPF therapies discussed below) could delay the onset of WHO Group 3 pulmonary hypertension. Following the results of the INCREASE study, we expanded our investigational efforts with inhaled treprostinil to examine its use to treat the lung diseases underlying PH ILD, including our TETON studies of Tyvaso in IPF patients. If the TETON program is successful, we anticipate seeking an IPF indication for Tyva so and Tyvaso DPI (if approved). There are currently 2 therapies that are approved to treat IPF Ofev (nintedanib), which is marketed by Boehringer Ingelheim International GmbH, and Esbriet (pirfenid1), which is marketed by F. Hoffman La Roche Ltd. ( Roche ). However, clinical studies have indicated that these therapies only slow lung function decline in IPF patients, resulting in a significant unmet need for therapies that halt or reverse lung function decline in IPF. There are a number of potentially competing therapies in advanced clinical development for IPF. These therapies include, but are not limited to, Galapagos NV GLPG4716 (phase 1), FibroGen, Inc. pamrevlumab (phase 3), F. Hoffmann La Roche AG rhPTX 2; formerly PRM 151 (recombinant human pentraxin 2) (phase 3), Galecto, Inc. GB0139 (phase 2), Sanofi S.A. s belumosudil (KD025) (phase 2), MediciNova, Inc. tipelukast (MN 001) (phase 2), Nitto Denko Corporation ND L02 s0201 (phase 2), Bristol Myers Squibb Company Orencia (abatacept) (phase 2) and BMS 986278 (phase 2), Celgene Corporation CC 90001 (phase 2), and Horizon Therapeutics plc HZN 825 (phase 2). Unituxin may face competition from Qarziba (dinutuximab beta), an antibody product developed by Apeiron Biologics AG that is approved in Europe to treat high risk neuroblastoma, but is not approved in the United States. In October 2016, EUSA Pharma (UK) Ltd. announced it had acquired global commercialization rights to Qarziba. In addition, Y mAbs Therapeutics, Inc. ( Y mAbs ), is developing several GD 2 targeting drug candidates, and in November 2020 obtained FDA approval for Danyelza (naxitamab 18 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation gqgk) to treat pediatric and adult patients with relapsed and refractory (second line) high risk neuroblastoma in b1 or b1 marrow. Y mAbs is also conducting studies of naxitamab for frontline high risk neuroblastoma. We compete with the developers, manufacturers, and distributors of all of the products noted above for customers, funding, access to licenses, personnel, third party collaborators, product development, and commercialization. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial, marketing, sales, distribution and technical resources, and more experience in research and development, product development, manufacturing and marketing, clinical trials, and regulatory matters, than we have. Governmental Regulation Pharmaceutical Product Approval Process The research, development, testing, manufacture, promotion, marketing, distribution, sampling, storage, approval, labeling, record keeping, post approval monitoring and reporting, and import and export of pharmaceutical products are extensively regulated by governmental agencies in the United States and in other countries. In the United States, failure to comply with requirements under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ( FDC Act ), the Public Health Service Act ( PHSA ), and other federal statutes and regulations, may subject a company to a variety of administrative or judicial sanctions, such as FDA refusal to approve pending NDAs or BLAs, warning letters, product recalls, product seizures, total or partial suspension of manufacturing or distribution, injunctions, fines, civil penalties, and criminal prosecution. Satisfaction of FDA pre market approval requirements is extremely costly and typically takes many years. The actual cost and time required may vary substantially based upon the type, complexity, and novelty of the product or disease. Drugs are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA in the United States, the EMA in the EU, and similar regulatory authorities in other countries. The steps ordinarily required before a new drug may be marketed in the United States, which are similar to steps required in most other countries, include (1) preclinical testing; (2) submission to the FDA of an IND; (3) clinical studies, including well controlled clinical trials, in healthy volunteers and patients to establish safety, efficacy, and dose response characteristics for each drug indication; (4) submission of an NDA to the FDA; and (5) FDA review and approval of the NDA. Preclinical Testing Preclinical tests include laboratory evaluation of product chemistry and formulation, as well as animal studies to explore toxicity and for proof of concept. The conduct of the preclinical tests must comply with federal regulations and requirements including good laboratory practices. Submission of IND The results of preclinical testing are submitted to the FDA as part of an IND, along with other information including information about product chemistry, manufacturing and controls, and a proposed clinical trial protocol. Absent FDA objection within 30 days after submission of an IND, the IND becomes effective and the clinical trial proposed in the IND may begin. Clinical Studies Clinical trials involve the administration of the investigational new drug to healthy volunteers or patients under the supervision of a qualified investigator. Clinical trials must be conducted (1) in compliance with federal regulations; (2) in compliance with good clinical practices ( GCP ), an international standard meant to protect the rights and health of patients and to define the roles of clinical trial sponsors, administrators, and monitors; and (3) under protocols detailing the objectives of the trial, the parameters to be used in monitoring safety and the criteria to be evaluated. Each protocol involving testing on U.S. patients and subsequent protocol amendments must be submitted to the FDA as part of the IND. The FDA may order the temporary or permanent discontinuation of a clinical trial at any time or impose other sanctions if it believes that the clinical trial is not being conducted in accordance with FDA requirements or presents an unacceptable risk to the clinical trial patients. The study protocol and informed consent information for patients in clinical trials must also be approved by an institutional review board ( IRB ). An IRB may also require the clinical trial at a site to be halted temporarily or permanently for failure to comply with the IRB requirements, or may impose other conditions. Clinical trials in support of an NDA typically are conducted in sequential phases, but the phases may overlap. Phase 1 involves the initial introduction of the drug into healthy human subjects or patients to assess metabolism, pharmacokinetics, pharmacological actions, side effects associated with increasing doses, and, if possible, early evidence on effectiveness. Phase 2 usually involves studies in a limited patient population to assess the efficacy of the drug in specific, targeted indications, explore tolerance and optimal dosage, and identify possible adverse effects and safety risks. Phase 3 trials, also called pivotal studies, major studies or advanced clinical trials, demonstrate clinical efficacy and safety in a larger number of patients, typically at geographically diverse clinical study sites, and permit the FDA to evaluate the overall benefit risk relationship of the drug and provide adequate information for drug labeling. 2021 Annual Report 19 Phase 4 studies are often conducted following marketing approval, in order to meet regulatory requirements or to provide additional data related to drug use. FDA Approval Process After successful completion of the required clinical testing, an NDA is typically submitted to the FDA in the United States, and a marketing authorization application is typically submitted to the EMA in the EU. FDA approval of the NDA is required before the product may be marketed in the United States. The NDA must include the results of all preclinical, clinical and other testing and a compilation of data related to the product pharmacology, chemistry, manufacture, and controls. The FDA has 60 days from its receipt of an NDA to determine whether the application will be accepted for filing. If the FDA determines that the application is not sufficiently complete to permit substantive review, it may request additional information and decline to accept the application for filing until the information is provided. Once the submission is accepted for filing, the FDA begins an in depth review. The FDA has agreed to certain performance goals in the review of NDAs. Most applications for non priority drugs are reviewed within ten to twelve months. Special pathways, including accelerated approval, fast track status, breakthrough therapy status, and priority review status are granted for certain drugs that offer major advances in treatment, or provide a treatment where no adequate therapy exists. These special pathways can significantly reduce the time it takes for the FDA to review an NDA, but do not guarantee that a product will receive FDA approval. In May 2018, the Right to Try Act established a new regulatory pathway to increase access to unapproved, investigational treatments for patients diagnosed with life threatening diseases or conditions who have exhausted approved treatment options and who are unable to participate in a clinical trial. The FDA may refer applications for novel pharmaceutical products or pharmaceutical products that present difficult questions of safety or efficacy to an advisory committee, typically a panel that includes clinicians and other experts, for review, evaluation, and a recommendation as to whether the application should be approved. The FDA is not bound by the recommendation of an advisory committee, but it generally follows such recommendations. During the review process, the FDA also reviews the drug product labeling to ensure that appropriate information is communicated to health care professionals and consumers. In addition, before approving an NDA, the FDA will typically inspect 1 or more clinical sites to assure compliance with GCP and the facility or the facilities at which the drug is manufactured to ensure they are in compliance with the FDA current Good Manufacturing Practices ( cGMP ). After the FDA evaluates the NDA and the manufacturing facilities, the FDA may issue either an approval letter or a complete response letter, which generally outlines the deficiencies in the submission and may require substantial additional testing or information in order for the FDA to reconsider the application. If and when those conditions have been addressed to the FDA satisfaction in a resubmission of the NDA, the FDA will issue an approval letter. The FDA has committed to reviewing such resubmissions in 2 or six months depending on the type of information included. Even after a resubmission, the FDA may decide that the application does not satisfy the regulatory criteria for approval. Post Approval Regulatory Requirements Once an NDA is approved, the product is subject to continuing regulation. For instance, pharmaceutical products may be marketed only for their approved indications and in accordance with the provisions of their approved labeling. The FDA closely regulates the post approval marketing, labeling, and advertising of prescription drugs, including direct to consumer advertising, off label promotion, industry sponsored scientific and educational activities, and promotional activities involving the Internet. Adverse event reporting and submission of periodic reports continue to be required following FDA approval of an NDA. In addition, as a condition of NDA approval, the FDA may require post marketing testing, including phase 4 clinical studies, and or a risk evaluation and mitigation strategy ( REMS ) to help ensure that the benefits of the drug outweigh the potential risks. A REMS can include medication guides, communication plans for healthcare professionals, special training or certification for prescribing or dispensing, dispensing only under certain circumstances, special monitoring, and the use of patient registries. Additionally, quality control as well as drug manufacture, packaging, and labeling procedures must continue to conform to cGMP requirements. Manufacturing facilities are subject to continual review and periodic inspections by the FDA and certain state agencies. Regulatory authorities may withdraw product approvals or request product recalls if a company fails to comply with regulatory standards or if previously unrecognized problems are subsequently discovered. Discovery of previously unknown problems with a product, including adverse events or problems with manufacturing processes of unanticipated severity or frequency, or failure to comply with regulatory requirements, may also result in (1) revisions to the approved labeling; (2) imposition of post market studies or clinical trials to assess new safety risks; or (3) imposition of distribution or other restrictions under a REMS program. Other potential consequences include (1) restrictions on the marketing or manufacturing of the product; (2) fines, warning letters, or holds on post approval clinical trials; (3) refusal of the FDA to approve pending NDAs or supplements to approved NDAs, or suspension or revocation of product license approvals; (4) product seizure or detention, or refusal to permit the import or export of products; or (5) injunctions or the imposition of civil or criminal penalties. Approval of Changes to an Approved Product Certain changes to the conditions established in an approved application, including changes in indications, labeling, equipment, or manufacturing processes or facilities, require submission and FDA approval of an NDA or NDA supplement before the change 20 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation can be implemented. An NDA supplement for a new indication typically requires clinical data similar to that in the original application, and the FDA uses the same procedures and actions in reviewing supplements as it does in reviewing NDAs. Orphan Drugs Under the Orphan Drug Act, an applicant can request the FDA to designate a product as an orphan drug in the United States if the drug is intended to treat a rare disease or condition affecting fewer than 200,000 people in the United States, or for which there is no reasonable expectation that U.S. sales will be sufficient to recoup the development and production costs. Orphan drug designation must be requested before submitting an NDA or BLA. Orphan drug designation does not convey any advantage in, or shorten the duration of, the regulatory review and approval process. The first NDA or BLA applicant to receive orphan drug designation and FDA approval for a particular active ingredient to treat a particular disease via a particular delivery method is entitled to a seven year exclusive marketing period in the United States. During the seven year period, the FDA may not approve any other application to market the same drug for the same disease, except in limited circumstances such as a showing of clinical superiority to the product with orphan drug exclusivity, meaning that it has greater effectiveness or safety, or provides a major contribution to patient care (such as a change in delivery system). Orphan drug exclusivity does not prevent the FDA from approving a different drug for the same disease or condition, or the same drug for a different disease or condition. The 21st Century Cures Act ( Cures Act ), which became law in December 2016, expanded the types of studies that qualify for orphan drug grants. Orphan drug designation also may qualify an applicant for federal tax credits related to research and development costs. Patent Term and Regulatory Exclusivity In 1984, the Hatch Waxman Act created a faster approval process for generic drugs, called the ANDA. Generally, an ANDA provides for marketing of a drug product that has the same active ingredients in the same strength(s), route of administration, and dosage form as an approved drug and has been shown through bioequivalence testing to be therapeutically equivalent to the approved drug, which is known as the reference listed drug ( RLD ). ANDA applicants are not required to conduct or submit results of preclinical or clinical tests to prove the safety or effectiveness of their drug product, other than the requirement for bioequivalence testing. Drugs approved in this way are commonly referred to as generic equivalents to the approved drug, and can often be substituted by pharmacists under prescriptions written for the original approved drug. In 2018, the FDA advanced policies aimed at promoting drug competition and patient access to generic drugs, such as issuing guidance about making complex generic drugs and the circumstances in which approval of a generic product application may be delayed. NDA applicants are required to identify each patent with claims that cover the drug (drug substance or drug product) or FDA approved method of using the drug. Upon product approval, these patents are listed in the FDA Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations, commonly known as the Orange Book. The Orange Book Transparency Act of 2020, enacted in January 2021, amends the statutory provisions regarding the types of patents and exclusivity related information listed in the Orange Book. The impact of these changes is not yet known. Every ANDA applicant must make 1 of several certifications to the FDA with regard to each Orange Book listed patent for the RLD. A Paragraph III certification states that the ANDA applicant seeks approval after the patent expires. A Paragraph IV certification asserts that the patent does not block approval of the ANDA, either because the patent is invalid or unenforceable or because the patent, even if valid, is not infringed by the new product. If the applicant does not challenge the listed patents, the ANDA will not be approved until all the listed patents claiming the referenced product have expired. Alternatively, for a method of use patent covering an approved indication, an ANDA applicant may submit a statement to the FDA that the company is not seeking approval for the covered indication. As a practical matter, this is available only if the RLD is approved for multiple indications, at least 1 of which is not patent protected. If the ANDA applicant has submitted a Paragraph IV certification to the FDA, the applicant must also send notice of the Paragraph IV certification to the NDA and patent holders once the ANDA has been accepted for filing by the FDA. The NDA and patent holders may then initiate a patent infringement lawsuit in response to the notice of the Paragraph IV certification. The filing of a patent infringement lawsuit within 45 days of the receipt of a Paragraph IV certification automatically prevents the FDA from approving the ANDA until the earlier of 30 months, expiration of the patent, settlement of the lawsuit or a decision in the infringement case that is favorable to the ANDA applicant. The Hatch Waxman Act also provides that patent terms may be extended to compensate for some of the patent life that is lost during the FDA regulatory review period for a product. This extension period is generally 1 half of the time between the effective date of an IND and the submission date of an NDA, plus all of the time between the submission date of an NDA and its approval, subject to a maximum extension of five years, and the limitation that the patent term cannot be extended more than 14 years after approval. Generally, patent term extension is available if the product represents the first permitted commercial marketing of a drug containing the active ingredient. Similar patent term extensions are available under European laws. An ANDA also will not be approved until any non patent exclusivity, such as exclusivity for obtaining approval of an NDA for a new chemical entity, has expired. Federal law provides a period of five years following approval of a drug containing no previously approved active ingredient, during which ANDAs for generic versions of those drugs cannot be submitted unless the submission contains a Paragraph IV certification, in which case the submission may be made four years following the original product approval. Following approval of an application to market a drug that contains previously approved active ingredients in a new dosage form, route of administration or combination, or for a new condition of use that was required to be supported by new 2021 Annual Report 21 clinical trials conducted by or for the sponsor, the FDC Act provides 3 years of exclusivity during which the FDA cannot grant effective approval of an ANDA for such new condition of use, dosage form, or strength that meets certain statutory requirements. Section 505(b)(2) New Drug Applications Most drug products (other than biological products) obtain FDA marketing approval pursuant to an NDA submitted under Section 505(b)(1) of the FDC Act, or an ANDA. A third alternative is a special type of NDA submitted under Section 505(b)(2) of the FDC Act, commonly referred to as a Section 505(b)(2) NDA, which enables the applicant to rely, in part, on the FDA finding of safety and efficacy data for an existing product, or published literature, in support of its application. Section 505(b)(2) NDAs may provide an alternate path to FDA approval for new or improved formulations or new uses of previously approved products. Section 505(b)(2) permits the filing of an NDA in which the applicant relies, at least in part, on information from studies made to show whether a drug is safe or effective that were not conducted by or for the applicant and for which the applicant has not obtained a right of reference or use. A Section 505(b)(2) applicant may eliminate the need to conduct certain preclinical or clinical studies, if it can establish that reliance on studies conducted for a previously approved product is scientifically appropriate. The FDA may also require companies to perform additional studies or measurements to support the change from the approved product. The FDA may then approve the new product candidate for all or some of the labeled indications for which the referenced product has been approved, as well as for any new indication for which the Section 505(b)(2) NDA applicant has submitted data. To the extent that the Section 505(b)(2) applicant relies on prior FDA findings of safety and efficacy, the applicant is required to certify to the FDA concerning any patents listed for the previously approved product in the Orange Book to the same extent that an ANDA applicant would. Thus, approval of a Section 505(b)(2) NDA can be delayed until all the listed patents claiming the referenced product have expired, until any non patent exclusivity, such as exclusivity for obtaining approval of a new active ingredient, listed in the Orange Book for the referenced product has expired, and, in the case of a Paragraph IV certification and subsequent patent infringement suit, until the earlier of 30 months, settlement of the lawsuit or a decision in the infringement case that is favorable to the Section 505(b)(2) applicant. Marketing Pharmaceutical Products Outside the United States Outside of the United States, our ability to market our products is also contingent upon receiving marketing authorizations from regulatory authorities. The foreign regulatory approval process may include some or all of the risks associated with the FDA review and approval process set forth above, and the requirements governing the conduct of clinical trials and marketing authorization vary widely from country to country. Biologics Biological products used for the prevention, treatment, or cure of a disease, or condition, of a human being are subject to regulation under the FDC Act and the PHSA. Biological products are approved for marketing via a BLA that follows an application process and carries approval requirements that are very similar to those for NDAs. To help reduce the increased risk of the introduction of adventitious agents, the PHSA emphasizes the importance of manufacturing control for products whose attributes cannot be precisely defined. The PHSA also provides authority to the FDA to immediately suspend licenses in situations where there is a danger to public health, to prepare or procure products in the event of shortages and critical public health needs, and to authorize the creation and enforcement of regulations to prevent the introduction, or spread, of communicable diseases in the United States. After a BLA is approved, the product may also be subject to official lot release, meaning the manufacturer must submit samples of each lot of product to the FDA together with a release protocol showing a summary of the history of manufacture of the lot and the results of all of the manufacturer tests performed on the lot. The FDA may also perform certain confirmatory tests on lots of some products, such as viral vaccines, before releasing the lots for distribution by the manufacturer. As with drugs, after approval of biologics, manufacturers must address any safety issues that arise, are subject to recalls or a halt in manufacturing, and are subject to periodic inspection after approval. The Biologics Price Competition and Innovation Act of 2009, or BPCI Act, created an abbreviated approval pathway for biological products shown to be biosimilar to an FDA licensed reference biological product to minimize duplicative testing. Biosimilarity requires the absence of clinically meaningful differences between the biological product and the reference product in terms of safety, purity, and potency, which, absent a waiver, must be shown through analytical studies, animal studies, and at least 1 clinical study. Intricacies associated with the larger, and often more complex, structures of biological products, as well as the processes by which such products are manufactured, pose significant hurdles to implementation that are still being addressed by the FDA. In July 2018, the FDA announced an action plan to encourage the development and efficient review of biosimilars, including the establishment of a new office within the agency that will focus on therapeutic biologics and biosimilars. On December 20, 2020, Congress amended the Public Health Services Act as part of the COVID 19 relief bill to further simplify the biosimilar review process by making it optional to show that conditions of use proposed in labelling have been previously approved for the reference product, which used to be a requirement of the application. In September 2021, the FDA issued 2 guidance documents intended to inform prospective applicants and facilitate the development of proposed biosimilars and 22 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation interchangeable biosimilars, as well as to describe the FDA interpretation of certain statutory requirements added by the BPCIA. A reference biologic is granted 12 years of exclusivity from the time of first licensure of the reference product. The first biologic product submitted under the abbreviated approval pathway that is approved as a biosimilar and also meets additional standards for interchangeability with the reference product, has exclusivity against other biologics submitted under the abbreviated approval pathway for a set period. Effective March 2020, certain products that were approved as drugs under the FDC Act, such as insulin and human growth horm1, are now deemed to be biologics under the PHSA, which means they may face competition through the biosimilars pathway and they may not be eligible for the twelve year period of exclusivity granted to new BLAs. Because biologically sourced raw materials are subject to unique contamination risks, their use may be restricted in some countries. Cell Based and Tissue Based Products Manufacturers of cell and tissue based products must comply with the FDA current good tissue practices ( cGTP ), which are FDA regulations that govern the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture of such products. The primary intent of the cGTP requirements is to ensure that cell and tissue based products are manufactured in a manner designed to prevent the introduction, transmission, and spread of communicable diseases. Cell and tissue based products may also be subject to the same approval standards, including demonstration of safety and efficacy, as other biologic and drug products, if they meet certain criteria such as if the cells or tissues are more than minimally manipulated or if they are intended for a non homologous use (a use different from the cell origin). The Cures Act established a new FDA Office of Tissues and Advanced Therapies and Regenerative Advanced Therapy ( RAT ) designation, which makes a product eligible for FDA priority review and accelerated approval. Therapies that are eligible for RAT designation include cell therapies, therapeutic tissue engineering products, human cell and tissue products, or any combination product using these therapies, with certain exceptions. For RAT designation, the product also must be intended to treat, modify, reverse, or cure a serious or life threatening disease or condition, and the preliminary clinical evidence must indicate that the product has the potential to address unmet medical needs for the disease or condition. Regulation of Medical Devices We currently do not hold any stand al1 medical device authorizations, but we do hold FDA authorization for the Tyvaso Inhalation System as part of the drug device combination NDA for Tyvaso. In addition, our business partners have the medical device clearances required to deliver our drugs, including, for example, the Remunity Pump. Medical devices may also be subject to FDA approval and extensive regulation under the FDC Act. Medical devices are classified into 1 of 3 classes Class I, Class II, or Class III. A higher class indicates a greater degree of risk associated with the device and a greater amount of control needed to ensure safety and effectiveness. All devices, unless exempt by FDA regulation, must adhere to a set of general controls, including compliance with the applicable portions of the FDA Quality System Regulation ( QSR ), which sets forth good manufacturing practice requirements; facility registration and product listing; reporting of adverse medical events; truthful and non misleading labeling; and promotion of the device consistent with its cleared or approved intended uses. Class II and III devices are subject to additional special controls and may require FDA clearance of a premarket notification ( 510(k) ) or approval of a PMA application. Most Class I devices are exempt from FDA premarket review or approval. Class II devices, with some exceptions, must be cleared by the FDA through the 510(k) process, which requires a company to show that the device is substantially equivalent to certain predicate devices already on the market. To be substantially equivalent, the proposed device must have the same intended use as the predicate device, and either have the same technological characteristics as the predicate device or have different technological characteristics and not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness than the predicate device. Once a 510(k) is cleared, any change that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device requires the submission and clearance of a new 510(k) before the change can be implemented. In November 2018, the FDA announced plans to significantly revise the 510(k) program to encourage reliance on modern predicates (e.g., predicates that are less than 10 years old). In January 2019, the FDA also finalized guidance on the alternative 510(k) pathway for well known device types, the Safety and Performance Based Pathway, which relies on modern performance based criteria and current technological principles to demonstrate substantial equivalence. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risks, such as life sustaining, life supporting, or some implantable devices, or devices that have a new intended use, or use advanced technology that is not substantially equivalent to that of a legally marketed device, are placed in Class III, requiring approval of a PMA application. A PMA generally requires data from clinical trials that establish the safety and effectiveness of the device. Once approved, certain changes, such as changes to manufacturing facilities, methods, or quality control procedures, or changes in the design specifications, which affect the safety or effectiveness of the device, require the submission of a PMA Supplement. Some pre amendment devices (devices that were legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976) are unclassified, but are subject to FDA premarket notification and clearance process in order to be commercially distributed. A 510(k) application also sometimes requires clinical data. 2021 Annual Report 23 The FDA also allows the submission of a direct de novo petition. This procedure allows a manufacturer whose novel device is automatically classified into Class III to request down classification of its medical device into Class I or Class II on the basis that the device presents low or moderate risk, rather than requiring the submission and approval of a PMA. Prior to the enactment of the Food and Drug Administration Safety and Innovation Act of 2012 ( FDASIA ), a medical device could only be eligible for de novo classification if the manufacturer first submitted a 510(k) premarket notification and received a determination from the FDA that the device was not substantially equivalent. FDASIA streamlined the de novo classification pathway by permitting manufacturers to request de novo classification directly without first submitting a 510(k) premarket notification to the FDA and receiving a not substantially equivalent determination. The 510(k), de novo or PMA processes can be expensive, lengthy, and unpredictable. The FDA 510(k) clearance process usually takes from 3 to 12 months, but can last longer. The process of obtaining a PMA approval is much more costly and uncertain than the 510(k) clearance process and generally takes from 1 to 3 years, or even longer, from the time the application is filed with the FDA. In addition, a PMA approval generally requires the performance of 1 or more clinical trials. Despite the time, effort, and cost invested by a sponsor, a device may not be approved or cleared by the FDA. The Cures Act requires the FDA to establish a program that would expedite access to devices that provide more effective treatment or diagnosis of life threatening or irreversibly debilitating diseases or conditions, for which no approved or cleared treatment exists or which offer significant advantages over existing approved or cleared alternatives. In December 2018, the FDA published final guidance on this breakthrough devices pathway which allows for sponsors to interact directly with the FDA during the development process and to receive prioritized review of their submission. In January 2021, the FDA released final guidance on the Safer Technologies Program ( STeP ), to encourage the innovation and market entry of device technologies that are safer than current alternatives but that do not otherwise satisfy the breakthrough device criteria, including device technologies to treat non life threatening or reasonably reversible conditions. STeP is modeled after the breakthrough device program and is intended to provide similar benefits, including increased communication with the FDA and prioritized review. Clinical trials for medical devices are subject to similar requirements as clinical trials with respect to drugs or biologics. Clinical trials involving significant risk devices (e.g., devices that present a potential for serious risk to the health, safety, or welfare of human subjects) are required to obtain both FDA approval of an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application and IRB approval before study initiation. Clinical trials involving non significant risk devices are not required to submit an IDE for FDA approval but must obtain IRB approval before study initiation. During a study, the sponsor is required to comply with the applicable FDA requirements, including, for example, trial monitoring, selecting clinical investigators and providing them with the investigational plan, ensuring IRB review, adverse event reporting, record keeping requirements, and prohibitions on the promotion of investigational devices or on making safety or effectiveness claims about them. The clinical investigators in the clinical study are also subject to FDA regulations and must obtain patient informed consent, rigorously follow the investigational plan and study protocol, control the disposition of the investigational device, and comply with all reporting and recordkeeping requirements. Additionally, after a trial begins, the sponsor, the FDA, or the IRB could suspend or terminate a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. After a device is cleared or approved for marketing, numerous and pervasive regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing with the FDA; QSR requirements, which require manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation, and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the design and manufacturing process labeling regulations and FDA prohibitions against the promotion of investigational products, or the promotion of off label uses of cleared or approved products; requirements related to promotional activities; clearance or approval of product modifications to 510(k) cleared devices that could significantly affect safety or effectiveness or that could constitute a major change in intended use of 1 of our cleared devices, or approval of certain modifications to PMA approved devices medical device reporting regulations, which require that a manufacturer report to the FDA if a device it markets may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d and the device or a similar device that it markets would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or serious injury, if the malfunction were to recur correction, removal, and recall reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA that may present a risk to health the FDA recall authority, whereby the agency can order device manufacturers to recall from the market a product that is in violation of governing laws and regulations and post market surveillance activities and regulations, which apply when deemed by the FDA to be necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device. The FDA has broad regulatory and enforcement powers with respect to medical devices, similar to those for drugs and biologics. The regulations are complex and have tended to become more stringent over time. Regulatory changes could result in additional restrictions or requirements. The FDA enforces these regulatory requirements through, among other means, periodic 24 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation unannounced inspections. Any failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements could result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may include any of the following sanctions adverse publicity, warning letters, untitled letters, it has come to our attention letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees, and civil penalties; repair, replacement, refunds, recall, or seizure of products; operating restrictions, partial suspension, or total shutdown of production; denial of requests for regulatory clearance or PMA approval of new products or services, new intended uses, or modifications to existing products or services; withdrawal of regulatory clearance or PMA approvals that have already been granted; or criminal prosecution. States also impose regulatory requirements on medical device manufacturers and distributors. The FDA also administers certain controls over the import and export of medical devices to and from the United States. Additionally, each foreign country subjects medical devices to its own regulatory requirements. States also impose regulatory requirements on medical device manufacturers and distributors. Failure to comply with the applicable federal or state requirements could result in, among other things (1) fines, injunctions, and civil penalties; (2) recall or seizure of products; (3) operating restrictions, partial suspension, or total shutdown of manufacturing; (4) refusing requests for approval of new products; (5) withdrawing approvals already granted; and (6) criminal prosecution. The FDA also administers certain controls over the import and export of medical devices to and from the United States. Additionally, each foreign country subjects medical devices to its own regulatory requirements. In the EU, there is no authorization process for medical devices. Medical devices are CE marked and placed on the market in the EU at the discretion and on the liability of their manufacturer following a conformity assessment process that may include the participation of a notified body. Combination Products A combination product is a product composed of a combination of 2 or more FDA regulated product comp1nts or products, e.g., drug device or device biologic. A combination product can take a variety of forms, such as a single entity made by physically or chemically combining comp1nts, or a single unit made of separately packaged products. Each combination product is assigned a lead FDA Center, which has jurisdiction for the premarket review and regulation, based on which constituent part of the combination product provides the primary mode of action, i.e., the mode of action expected to make the greatest contribution to the overall intended therapeutic effect of the product. If the classification as a combination product or the lead Center assignment is unclear or in dispute, a sponsor may request a meeting, submit a Request for Designation ( RFD ), and the FDA will issue a designation letter within 60 calendar days of the filing of the RFD. Depending on the type of combination product, the FDA may require a single application for approval, clearance, or licensure of the combination product, or separate applications for the constituent parts. During the review of marketing applications, the lead Center may consult or collaborate with other FDA Centers. In 2017, the FDA released final documents addressing the application of cGMP requirements and classification issues related to combination products. The Cures Act sets forth a number of provisions pertaining to combination products, such as procedures for negotiating disagreements between sponsors and the FDA and requirements intended to streamline FDA premarket reviews of combination products that contain an already approved comp1nt. For drug device combination products, comprised of an FDA approved drug and device primary mode of action, the Cures Act applies Hatch Waxman requirements to the premarket review process such that a patent dispute regarding the listed drug may result in the delay of the 510(k) clearance or PMA approval of the combination product. Furthermore, the Cures Act applies exclusivity provisions (e.g., new chemical entity and orphan drug exclusivities) to the device clearance and approval process for combination products with a device primary mode of action. Government Reimbursement of Pharmaceutical Products In the United States, many independent third party health plans, and government health care programs, such as Medicaid and Medicare, pay for patient use of our commercial products. A material portion of our product sales are reimbursed under these government programs. The availability of adequate government reimbursement for our products is subject to regulatory changes and controls affecting these programs. Medicaid is a joint federal and state program that is administered by the states for low income and disabled beneficiaries. We participate in the Medicaid Drug Rebate program, pursuant to which, as a condition of having federal funds made available for our drugs under Medicaid and Medicare Part B, we are required to pay a rebate to each state Medicaid program for our covered outpatient drugs that are reimbursed by Medicaid. Medicaid rebates are based on pricing data we report on a monthly and quarterly basis to the U.S. Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services ( CMS ), the federal agency that administers the Medicaid and Medicare programs. These data include the average manufacturer price and, in the case of innovator products, the best price for each drug which, in general, represents the lowest price available from the manufacturer to any entity in the U.S. in any pricing structure, calculated to include all applicable sales and associated rebates, discounts, and other price concessions. If we become 2021 Annual Report 25 aware that our reporting for a prior quarter was incorrect, or has changed as a result of recalculation of the pricing data, we are obligated to resubmit the corrected data for up to 3 years after those data originally were due. On December 31, 2020, CMS issued a final regulation that modified prior Medicaid Drug Rebate program regulations to permit reporting multiple best price figures with regard to value based purchasing arrangements (beginning in 2022); provide definitions for line extension, new formulation, and related terms, with the practical effect of expanding the scope of drugs considered to be line extensions that are subject to an alternative rebate formula (beginning in 2022); and revise best price and average manufacturer price exclusions of manufacturer sponsored patient benefit programs, specifically regarding applicability of such exclusions in the context of pharmacy benefit manager accumulator programs (beginning in 2023). Medicare is a federal program that is administered by the federal government that provides covered health care benefits to individuals age 65 or over and to certain disabled and chronically ill persons. We are required to provide average sales price ( ASP ) information for certain of our products to CMS on a quarterly basis. The ASP we report must be calculated based on a statutorily defined formula as well as regulations and interpretations of the statute by CMS. The ASP information is used by CMS to compute Medicare reimbursement rates for our drugs that are covered by Medicare Part B. Unituxin is administered entirely as an in patient therapy and would typically be reimbursed under Medicare Part A, which covers inpatient hospital benefits. However, because Unituxin is indicated for the treatment of a pediatric cancer, Medicare is unlikely to cover treatment, but Medicaid programs may cover pediatric patients requiring care. Remodulin and Tyvaso are reimbursable under Medicare Part B, which covers physician services and outpatient care. The Medicare Part B contractors who administer the program cover Remodulin and Tyvaso under local coverage determinations and provide reimbursement according to statutory guidelines. We pay rebates to sponsors that reimburse Medicare Part D products (Adcirca and Orenitram) as part of the Medicare Part D program, a voluntary outpatient prescription drug benefit to Medicare beneficiar ies. We anticipate that Tyvaso DPI will also be reimbursed under Medicare Part D, if it is approved by the FDA. State Medicaid programs also reimburse the cost of our commercial products at rates established by statutory guidelines. As noted above, when Remodulin, Tyvaso, Adcirca, Orenitram, and Unituxin are reimbursed by state Medicaid programs, we must pay rebates on our products to those state Medicaid programs . We anticipate that the same will be true for Tyvaso DPI, if it is approved by the FDA. Federal law requires that any company th at participates in the Medicaid Drug Rebate program also participate in the Public Health Service 340B drug pricing program, in order for federal funds to be available for the manufacturer drugs under Medicaid and Medicare Part B. The 340B program, which is administered by the Health Resources and Services Administration ( HRSA ), requires participating manufacturers to agree to charge statutorily defined covered entities no more than the 340B ceiling price for the manufacturer covered outpatient drugs. These 340B covered entities include a variety of community health clinics and other entities that receive health services grants from the Public Health Service, as well as hospitals that serve a disproportionate share of low income patients. The 340B ceiling price is calculated using a statutory formula, which is based on the average manufacturer price and rebate amount for the covered outpatient drug as calculated under the Medicaid Drug Rebate program, and in general, products subject to Medicaid price reporting and rebate liability are also subject to the 340B ceiling price calculation and discount requirement. A regulation regarding the calculation of the 340B ceiling price and the imposition of civil m1tary penalties on manufacturers that knowingly and intentionally overcharge covered entities became effective on January 1, 2019. Implementation of this regulation could affect our obligations and potential liability under the 340B program in ways we cannot anticipate. We also are required to report our 340B ceiling prices to HRSA on a quarterly basis, which HRSA then publishes to 340B covered entities. Moreover, HRSA established an administrative dispute resolution ( ADR ) process under a final regulation effective January 13, 2021, for claims by covered entities that a manufacturer engaged in overcharging, and by manufacturers that a 340B covered entity violated the prohibitions against diversion or duplicate discounts. Such claims are to be resolved through an ADR panel of government officials rendering a decision that could be appealed only in federal court. An ADR proceeding could potentially subject us to discovery by covered entities and other 1rous procedural requirements and could result in additional liability. Further, legislation may be introduced that, if passed, would further expand the 340B program to additional covered entities, expand manufacturer ceiling price obligations to so called contract pharmacies, or require participating manufacturers to agree to provide 340B discounted pricing on drugs used in an inpatient setting. Any additional future changes to the definition of average manufacturer price and the Medicaid rebate amount could affect our 340B ceiling price calculations and negatively impact our results of operations. In order to be eligible to have our products paid for with federal funds under the Medicaid and Medicare Part B programs and purchased by certain federal agencies and grantees, we also participate in the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs ( VA ) Federal Supply Schedule ( FSS ) pricing program. Under this program, we are obligated to make our products available for procurement under an FSS contract under which we must comply with standard government terms and conditions and charge a price to certain federal agencies that is no higher than the statutory Federal Ceiling Price ( FCP ). The FCP is based on the non federal average manufacturer price ( Non FAMP ), which we calculate and report to the VA on a quarterly and annual basis. We also participate in the Tricare Retail Pharmacy program, under which we pay quarterly rebates on utilization of innovator products that are dispensed through the Tricare Retail Pharmacy ne2rk to Tricare beneficiaries. The rebates are calculated as the difference between the annual Non FAMP and FCP. Pricing and rebate calculations vary across products and programs, are complex, and are often subject to interpretation by us, governmental or regulatory agencies, and the courts, which can change and evolve over time. 26 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation In addition, in the U.S., drug pricing by pharmaceutical companies is currently, and is expected to continue to be, under close scrutiny, including with respect to companies that have increased the price of products after acquiring those products from other companies. There are numerous ongoing efforts at the federal and state level seeking to indirectly or directly regulate drug prices to reduce overall healthcare costs using tools such as price ceilings, value based pricing, and increased transparency and disclosure obligations. Several states have passed or are considering legislation that requires or purports to require companies to report pricing information, including proprietary pricing information. For example, in 2017, California adopted a prescription drug price transparency state bill requiring advance notice of and an explanation for price increases of certain drugs that exceed a specified threshold. Similar bills have been introduced previously at the federal level and also enacted in other states, and additional legislation could be introduced in the future. Anti Kickback, False Claims Laws, and The Prescription Drug Marketing Act The federal Anti Kickback Statute ( AKS ) prohibits, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting, or receiving remuneration to induce or in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering or arranging for the purchase, lease or order of, or referring an individual for the furnishing of, any healthcare item or service reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid, or other federally financed healthcare programs. This statute has been interpreted broadly to apply to arrangements between pharmaceutical manufacturers and prescribers, purchasers, formulary managers, and others. The term remuneration has been broadly interpreted to apply to anything of value including, for example, gifts, cash payments, donations, waivers of payment, ownership interests, and providing any item, service, or compensation for something other than fair market value. Liability under the AKS may be established without proving actual knowledge of the statute or specific intent to violate it. Although there are a number of statutory exceptions and regulatory safe harbors to the AKS protecting certain common business arrangements and activities from prosecution or regulatory sanctions, the exceptions and safe harbors are drawn narrowly. Practices that involve remuneration to those who prescribe, purchase, or recommend pharmaceutical and biological products, including certain discounts, or engaging such individuals as consultants, advisors, and speakers, may be subject to scrutiny if they do not fit squarely within an exception or safe harbor. Moreover, there are no safe harbors for many common practices, such as educational and research grants, charitable donations, product support, and patient assistance programs. The regulatory safe harbors also are subject to regulatory revision and interpretation by a number of government agencies. For example, in November 2020, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services finalized a previously aband1d proposal to amend the discount safe harbor regulation of the AKS in a purported effort to create incentives to manufacturers to lower their list prices, and to lower federal program beneficiary out of pocket costs. The rule revises the AKS discount safe harbor to exclude manufacturer rebates to Medicare Part D plans, either directly or through pharmacy benefit managers ( PBMs ), creates a new safe harbor for point of sale price reductions that are set in advance and are available to the beneficiary at the point of sale, and creates a new safe harbor for service fees paid by manufacturers to PBMs for services rendered to the manufacturer. In response to a legal challenge brought by a trade association representing PBMs, the Biden Administration has agreed to delay the effective date of the rule by 1 year to January 1, 2023 It is too early to know whether the Biden Administration will further delay, rewrite, or allow the rule to go into effect, and if so, what the effect of the rule will be on negotiations of coverage for our products under Medicare Part D plans, or whether the rule will affect our coverage arrangements with commercial insurers. It is also unclear whether the rule will have the intended effect of reducing net prices and beneficiary out of pocket costs without also increasing Medicare Part D premiums, which may impact the willingness of Part D plans to cover our products and the price concessions or other terms the plans or their PBMs may seek from us. Violations of the AKS are punishable by imprisonment, criminal fines, damages, civil m1tary penalties, exclusion from participation in federal healthcare programs, and liability under the federal civil False Claims Act ( FCA ). The FCA prohibits any person from, among other things, presenting, or causing to be presented, a false or fraudulent claim for payment of government funds, or making, or causing to be made, a false statement material to a false or fraudulent claim. Actions under the FCA may be brought by the Attorney General or as a qui tam action by a private individual in the name of the government. Such private individuals may share in amounts paid by the defendant to the government in recovery or settlement. Many pharmaceutical and other healthcare companies have been prosecuted under the FCA for allegedly inflating drug prices they report to pricing services, which in turn were used by the government to set Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement rates; for allegedly providing free product to customers with the expectation that the customers would bill federal programs for the product; for violating the AKS; for materially deviating from statutorily required manufacturing standards; and on the basis of allegations related to certain marketing practices, including off label promotion. FCA liability is potentially significant in the healthcare industry because the statute provides for treble damages and significant mandatory penalties per false or fraudulent claim or statement, as well as exclusion from participation in federal healthcare programs. Many states also have statutes or regulations similar to the AKS and the FCA, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs, or, in several states, apply regardless of the payer. Several states have enacted legislation requiring pharmaceutical companies to, among other things, establish marketing compliance programs; file periodic reports with the state, including reports on gifts and payments to individual health care providers; make periodic public disclosures on sales, marketing, pricing, clinical trials, and other activities; and or register their sales representatives. Some states prohibit certain sales and marketing practices, including the provision of gifts, meals, or other Item to health care providers, and still others prohibit offering co pay support to patients for certain prescription drugs. The federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, implemented as the Open Payments Program, requires certain manufacturers of drugs, devices, biologics, and medical supplies for which payment is available under Medicare, Medicaid, or the Children Health 2021 Annual Report 27 Insurance Program (with certain exceptions) to report annually to CMS information related to payments and other transfers of value to physicians (defined to include doctors, dentists, optometrists, podiatrists, and chiropractors) and teaching hospitals, as well as ownership and investment interests held by physicians and their immediate family members. Beginning in 2022, applicable manufacturers also will be required to report information regarding payments and transfers of value provided to physician assistants, nurse practiti1rs, clinical nurse specialists, certified nurse anesthetists, and certified nurse midwives. We are also subject to numerous other anti bribery and anti fraud laws, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the UK Bribery Act, and the federal Civil M1tary Penalties Law. As part of the sales and marketing process, pharmaceutical companies frequently provide samples of approved drugs to physicians. The Prescription Drug Marketing Act ( PDMA ) imposes requirements and limitations upon the distribution of drugs and drug samples, and prohibits states from licensing distributors of prescription drugs unless the state licensing program meets certain federal guidelines that include minimum standards for storage and handling, as well as record keeping requirements for information regarding sample requests and distribution. The PDMA sets forth civil and criminal penalties for violations. In addition, PDMA requires manufacturers and distributors to submit similar drug sample information to the FDA. Sanctions under these federal and state laws may include treble damages, civil penalties, exclusion of a manufacturer products from reimbursement under government programs, criminal fines, and imprisonment. Outside the U.S., interactions between pharmaceutical companies and physicians are also governed by strict laws, regulations, industry self regulation codes of conduct, and physicians codes of professional conduct. The provision of benefits or advantages to physicians to induce or encourage the prescription, recommendation, endorsement, purchase, supply, order, or use of medicinal products, which is prohibited in the EU, is governed by the national anti bribery laws of the EU member states. Violation of these laws could result in substantial fines and imprisonment. Certain EU member states, or industry codes of conduct, require that payments made to physicians be publicly disclosed. Moreover, agreements with physicians must often be the subject of prior notification and approval by the physician employer, his her competent professional organization, and or the competent authorities of the individual EU member states. Failure to comply with these requirements could result in reputational risk, public reprimands, administrative penalties, fines, or imprisonment. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 ( PPACA ) The PPACA expanded healthcare coverage within the United States. The PPACA substantially changed the way healthcare is financed by both governmental and commercial payers, and significantly impacted the U.S. pharmaceutical industry. Among other things, the PPACA subjects biologics to potential competition by lower cost biosimilars; establishes a different methodology by which rebates owed by manufacturers under the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program, or MDRP, are calculated for covered outpatient drugs that are inhaled, infused, instilled, implanted, or injected; increases the minimum Medicaid rebates owed by manufacturers under the MDRP and extends the rebate program to individuals enrolled in Medicaid managed care organizations; establishes annual fees and taxes on manufacturers of certain branded prescription drugs; creates a Medicare Part D coverage gap discount program in which, as a condition of coverage of its products under Medicare Part D, manufacturers must agree to offer point of sale discounts off of negotiated prices for applicable brand drugs to eligible beneficiaries during their coverage gap period; and expands the Public Health Service Act 340B drug pricing program, including by creating new penalties for non compliance. The PPACA and certain of its provisions have been subject to judicial challenges as well as efforts to repeal or replace them or to alter their interpretation or implementation. For example, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, enacted in December 2017, eliminated the tax based payment required of individuals who fail to maintain minimum essential coverage under section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, commonly referred to as the individual mandate, effective January 1, 2019. On December 14, 2018, a United States District Court judge in Texas ruled that the Affordable Care Act is unconstitutional in its entirety because of Congress repeal of the individual mandate. On December 18, 2019, the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit ( Fifth Circuit ) affirmed the portion of the district court ruling declaring the individual mandate unconstitutional and remanded for the district court to conduct analysis in the first instance on which provisions of the statute are severable from it and thus remain intact. The Supreme Court was asked to hear the case before it was remanded to the district court. The Supreme Court heard the case, and overturned the Fifth Court affirmation on the basis that the plaintiffs lacked standing to challenge the law and did not address its constitutionality. The Supreme Court decision left open the opportunity for additional challenges to the ACA. The Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018, among other things, amended the Medicare Act (as amended by the PPACA) to increase the point of sale discounts that manufacturers must agree to offer under the Medicare Part D coverage discount program from 50 percent to 70 percent off negotiated prices of applicable brand drugs to eligible beneficiaries during their coverage gap period, as a condition for the manufacturer outpatient drugs being covered under Medicare Part D. Section 4408 of the CARES Act temporarily suspended Medicare sequestration during the period of May 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, while extending the Medicare sequestration sunset date through 2030. There may be additional legislative changes, regulatory changes, and judicial challenges related to the PPACA. It is unclear how the PPACA and its implementation, as well as any efforts to repeal, replace or otherwise modify, or invalidate, the PPACA, or portions thereof, will affect our business. 28 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation 21st Century Cures Act The Cures Act, which was signed into law on December 13, 2016, contains a wide range of provisions designed to promote clinical research and streamline and expedite the FDA review and approval process. For example, the law clarifies the FDA authority regarding drugs that target rare diseases, and broadens the type of data and information that may be used to support a drug or biologic application for a genetically targeted drug or variant protein targeted drug. The law requires the FDA to facilitate development programs for, and provides expedited review of, regenerative advanced therapies. The law further requires the FDA to establish a program to evaluate the use of real world evidence, i.e., evidence from sources other than randomized clinical trials, to support the approval of certain drug and biological product applications and to satisfy post approval requirements; in 2018, the FDA published a framework for evaluating real world evidence. In 2019, the FDA announced numerous initiatives and guidance documents intended to improve and streamline the drug approval process. The effects of these initiatives, which are still being implemented and announced, are not yet known. Other key provisions related to orphan drugs, combination products, and medical devices, are discussed separately above. State Pharmaceutical and Medical Device Marketing Laws If not preempted by the PPACA, several jurisdictions require pharmaceutical companies to report expenses related to the marketing and promotion of pharmaceutical products and to report gifts and payments to healthcare practiti1rs in those jurisdictions, or to obtain licenses for sales representatives and require them to satisfy educational and other requirements. Some of these jurisdictions also prohibit various marketing related activities. Still other states require the disclosure of information related to drug pricing and clinical studies and their outcomes. In addition, certain states require pharmaceutical companies to implement compliance programs or marketing codes and several other states are considering similar proposals. Compliance with these laws is difficult and time consuming, and companies that do not comply with these state laws face civil penalties or other civil enforcement action. Privacy Laws We must comply with numerous federal, state, and non U.S. laws that govern the privacy and security of health and other personal information. In the U.S., numerous federal and state laws and regulations govern the collection, use, disclosure, and protection of health related and other personal information. Many of these laws differ from each other in significant ways and may not have the same effect, thus complicating compliance efforts. Compliance with these laws is difficult, constantly evolving, and time consuming. Federal regulators, state attorneys general, and plaintiffs attorneys, including class action attorneys, have been and will likely continue to be active in this space. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ) imposes privacy, security, and breach reporting obligations, including mandatory contractual terms, with respect to safeguarding the privacy and security of individually identifiable health information upon covered entities subject to the rule. Although we are not directly subject to HIPAA other than with respect to providing certain employee benefits we could be subject to criminal penalties if we knowingly obtain, use, or disclose individually identifiable health information maintained by a HIPAA covered entity in a manner that is not authorized or permitted by HIPAA. We also may obtain health information from third parties (including research institutions from which we obtain clinical trial data) that are subject to privacy and security requirements under HIPAA. In addition, we are required to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act ( CCPA ). The CCPA became effective on January 1, 2020 and establishes certain requirements for data use and sharing transparency, and provides California residents certain rights concerning the use, disclosure, and retention of their personal data. The CCPA and its implementing regulations have already been amended multiple times since their enactment. Similarly, there are a number of legislative proposals in the United States, at both the federal and state level, that could impose new obligations or limitations in areas affecting our business. These laws and regulations are evolving and subject to interpretation, and may impose limitations on our activities or otherwise adversely affect our business. The obligations to comply with the CCPA and evolving legislation require us, among other things, to update our notices and develop new processes internally and with our partners. We may be subject to fines, penalties, or private actions in the event of non compliance with these laws. Outside the U.S., the legislative and regulatory landscape for privacy and data security continues to evolve. There has been increased attention to privacy and data security issues that could potentially affect our business, including the EU General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ), which became effective on May 25, 2018 and imposes potential penalties up to the greater of 20 million or four percent of annual global revenue for failure to comply with its requirements. In addition, the CCPA and laws and regulations enacted in the United States, Europe, Asia, and Latin America, increase potential enforcement and litigation activity. In the event we enroll subjects in our ongoing or future clinical trials in the EU, we may be subject to additional privacy restrictions, including restrictions relating to the collection, use, storage, transfer, and other processing of personal data, including personal health data, regarding individuals in the European Economic Area ( EEA ) as governed by the GDPR. The GDPR imposes several requirements on companies that process personal data, strict rules on the transfer of personal data out of the EEA, including to the U.S., and fines and penalties for failure to comply with the requirements of the GDPR and the related 2021 Annual Report 29 national data protection laws of the EU member states. The GDPR also confers a private right of action on data subjects and consumer associations to lodge complaints with supervisory authorities, seek judicial remedies, and obtain compensation for damages resulting from violations of the GDPR. The obligations under the GDPR may be 1rous and adversely affect our business, financial condition, results of operations, and prospects. Compliance with the GDPR will be a rigorous and time intensive process that may increase our cost of doing business or require us to change our business practices, and despite those efforts, there is a risk that we may be subject to fines and penalties, litigation, and reputational harm in connection with any European activities. Further, the United Kingdom exiting of the EU, often referred to as Brexit, has created uncertainty with regard to data protection regulation in the United Kingdom. In particular, it is unclear how data transfers to and from the United Kingdom will be regulated. Because of the remote work policies we implemented due to the COVID 19 pandemic, information that is normally protected, including company confidential information, may be less secure. Cybersecurity and data security threats continue to evolve and raise the risk of an incident that could affect our operations or compromise our business information or sensitive personal information, including health data. We may also need to collect more extensive health related information from our employees to manage our workforce. If we or our third party partners fail to comply or are alleged to have failed to comply with applicable data protection and privacy laws and regulations, and related employment rules, or if we were to experience a data breach involving personal information, we could be subject to government enforcement actions or private lawsuits. In addition, our business could be adversely impacted if our ability to transfer personal data outside of the EEA or Switzerland is restricted, which could adversely impact our operating results. Other Laws and Regulations Numerous other statutory and regulatory regimes affect our business and operations. For example, our research and development efforts may be subject to laws, regulations, and recommendations related to safe working conditions, laboratory practices, use of animals in research and development activities, and the purchase, storage, movement, import, export, and use and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous substances. Antitrust and competition laws may restrict our ability to enter into certain agreements involving exclusive license rights. Future legislation and administrative action will continue to affect our business, the extent and degree of which we cannot accurately predict. Environmental Matters We are subject to a number of laws and regulations that require compliance with federal, state, and local regulations for the protection of the environment. We believe that our operations comply in all material respects with such applicable laws and regulations. Our compliance with these requirements did not change during the past year, and is not expected to have a material effect upon our capital expenditures, cash flows, earnings, or competitive position. Human Capital We are united by our commitment to developing innovative therapies for unmet needs and our dedication to be responsible citizens that have a positive impact on patients, the environment, and society. Our employees, whom we call Unitherians , are mission critical to these commitments because they share the same passion and dedication to meeting our purpose. As of December 31, 2021, we had approximately 965 employees working across our 11 facilities worldwide. Our people mission focuses on five key commitments, providing Unitherians with Challenging, innovative work Opportunities for career advancement Autonomy to do their best work Inspiring work environment allowing for work life integration Competitive pay and benefits In 2021, we achieved $175 million in revenue per employee, which ranks near the top of our industry peer group. We feel strongly that such industry leading productivity cannot be maintained without a core focus on our family of Unitherians, and a dedication to ensuring they are healthy and engaged. The Compensation Committee of our Board of Directors ( Board ) oversees our human capital management priorities. The Unitherian Culture. We are intentional in our effort to maintain our entrepreneurial culture. We believe this instills a greater sense of ownership, meaning, and commitment in Unitherians, motivating them to work as hard as possible to achieve our ambitious goals. Moreover, we are confident that our culture provides us with a competitive advantage by enabling us to attract the best talent to drive innovation and excellence in pursuit of our key strategic objectives. 30 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation PBC Conversion. In 2021, we converted United Therapeutics into a public benefit corporation, becoming the only company in our industry to do so. As a public benefit corporation, our Board is now obligated to balance the interests of its patient focused public benefit purpose, the financial interests of shareholders, and the interest of other stakeholders who are materially impacted by our conduct, such as Unitherians. We believe that this conversion has helped further underscore our commitment to Unitherians, and well as our mission driven public benefit purpose of creating a brighter future for patients. Recruitment, Retention, and Talent Development. We strive to hire exceptionally smart people who are passionately committed to our goals and who will thrive in our unique culture. We provide Unitherians with a variety of personal and professional development opportunities for them to grow and thrive. We believe that our recruitment and talent development efforts are key factors in our low turnover compared to our industry peer group, which historically has trended well below the industry average. In 2021, we continued that trend with our voluntary turnover at 7.2 percent, well below industry average of 136 percent (based on June 1, 2020 through June 1, 2021 data from Aon Radford Turnover Study for the Life Sciences and Medical Devices Sector , published December 2021). Diversity and Inclusion. We are proud of our diverse workforce, and we firmly believe that being a great place to work means being diverse and inclusive. Women represent 50 percent of all Unitherians and 36 percent of our workforce identify as members of a racial or ethnic minority. We foster diversity and inclusion in many different ways, including support of Unitherian resource groups and through our Inclusion Advisory Group that provides ongoing input to our DEI Executive Council on diversity, equity, and inclusion strategies and initiatives. In 2021, 100% of Unitherians participated in training, facilitated discussions, and other activities as part of our multi year, company wide training initiative to promote and enrich awareness of important diversity, equity, and inclusion topics. Employee Communication and Engagement. We encourage Unitherians to speak up, and we take action when they identify a concern. We also take steps to promote proactive communication by our management team, including Unitherian recognition, personal updates from leadership, and cross functional engagement. Our Unitherian engagement initiatives include town hall meetings to connect Unitherians with company management, patient focused sessions to connect Unitherians to the patient experience, and using Workplace by Facebook to create an Unitherian only social environment to connect Unitherians across functions. We also regularly conduct broad surveys to solicit the views of Unitherians. Our efforts are borne out in the results of recent Unitherian engagement surveys, which showed that approximately 93 percent of respondents have a high degree of trust and are likely to be retained. A Holistic Approach to Total Rewards and Employee Wellness. We require an exceptionally talented workforce. Because Unitherians are key to driving our strategic goals, we provide robust people programs that demonstrate the high value we place on the financial, mental, and physical wellness of Unitherians. Our comprehensive total rewards package includes short and long term incentive compensation that enables all of our full time Unitherians to participate in our financial success. For example, all full time domestic Unitherians are eligible to receive minimum annual compensation of $75,000, including salary and bonus. We also provide meaningful opportunities for Unitherians to share in our success by making every full time Unitherian a shareholder through our long term incentive programs. We offer market leading benefit programs and provide access to a variety of health and wellness facilities and programs, such as on site childcare centers and state of the art fitness centers, and access to 24 7 Unitherian assistance programs. Our COVID 19 Response. Our commitment to the wellness of Unitherians, who are working hard to support a continuous supply of medicines to our patients, has been crucial during the COVID 19 pandemic. Throughout the pandemic, we have maintained consistent contact with Unitherians to help keep them safe and feeling connected. Early in the pandemic we moved quickly to pivot all Unitherians who could work remotely into a work from home model and focused on providing the safest possible working environment for those Unitherians who were required to work in our facilities. In spring 2021, we communicated to our workforce our plans for a phased return to working in person well in advance to enable Unitherians to plan accordingly, and we continue to provide flexible options for hybrid work arrangements. As part of our continued effort to ensure the health and safety of our Unitherians, we required all Unitherians to be fully vaccinated before returning to in person work in September 2021 We are also encouraging Unitherians to receive booster shots as they become eligible to do so. We continue to offer paid time off to Unitherians who need to isolate for COVID related reasons. We remain committed to ensuring the safest possible work environment and acknowledging Unitherians contributions during this unprecedented time. Board Oversight. Our Board, through its Compensation Committee, oversees our human capital management strategies, including our focus on diversity, equity, and inclusion; workplace environment and culture; and talent development and retention. These topics are generally reviewed and discussed at meetings of both the Compensation Committee and of the full Board, at least annually. Corporate Website Our Internet website address is http www.unither.com . Our filings on Form 10 K, Form 10 Q, Form 3, Form 4, Form 5, Form 8 K, and any and all amendments thereto are available free of charge through this Internet website as soon as reasonably practicable after they are filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission ( SEC ). They are also available through the SEC at http www.sec.gov edgar searchedgar companysearch.html . 2021 Annual Report 31 INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS The following is a list, as of February 24, 2022, setting forth certain information regarding our executive officers. Each executive officer holds office until the first meeting of the Board of Directors after the annual meeting of shareholders, and until his or her successor is elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal. Each executive officer employment will end pursuant to the terms of his or her employment contract. Name Age Position Martine Rothblatt, Ph.D., J.D., M.B.A. 67 Chairperson and Chief Executive Officer Michael Benkowitz 50 President and Chief Operating Officer James C. Edgemond 54 Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer Paul A. Mahon, J.D. 58 Executive Vice President, General Counsel, and Corporate Secretary Martine Rothblatt, Ph.D., J.D., M.B.A . , founded United Therapeutics in 1996 and has served as Chairperson and Chief Executive Officer since its inception. Previously, she created the satellite radio company SiriusXM. She is an inventor or co inventor on nine U.S. patents, with additional patents pending. Her pi1ering book, Your Life or Mine How Geoethics Can Resolve the Conflict Between Private and Public Interests in Xenotransplantation , anticipated the need for both global virus bio surveillance and a greatly expanded supply of transplantable organs. Michael Benkowitz joined United Therapeutics in 2011 as our Executive Vice President, Organizational Development, and was promoted to President and Chief Operating Officer in 2016. He is responsible for all of our commercial, medical affairs, and corporate compliance activities, most company wide administrative functions, including human resources and information technology, many of our business development efforts, and several of our key business alliances and partnerships. James C. Edgemond joined United Therapeutics in January 2013 as Treasurer and Vice President, Strategic Financial Planning. Mr. Edgemond was promoted to Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer in March 2015. Prior to joining United Therapeutics, he was Vice President, Corporate Controller and Treasurer of Clark Construction Group from 2008 through January 2013 He also served in a variety of roles at The Corporate Executive Board Company from 1998 to 2008, serving as Executive Director, Finance from 2005 to 2008. He began his career as a public accountant at KPMG Peat Marwick LLP, from 1990 through 1998, where he served in a variety of roles, including as a Senior Manager prior to his departure. Paul A. Mahon, J.D., has served as General Counsel and Corporate Secretary of United Therapeutics since its inception in 1996. In 2001, Mr. Mahon joined United Therapeutics full time as Senior Vice President, General Counsel, and Corporate Secretary. In 2003, Mr. Mahon was promoted to Executive Vice President, General Counsel, and Corporate Secretary. Prior to 2001, he served United Therapeutics, beginning with its formation in 1996, in his capacity as principal and managing partner of a law firm specializing in technology and media law. 32 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation Item 1A. Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Products and Our Operations We rely heavily on sales of Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram to generate revenues and support our operations. Sales of Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram comprise the vast majority of our revenues. Substantially decreased sales of any of these products could have a material adverse impact on our operations. A wide variety of events, such as withdrawal of regulatory approvals or substantial changes in prescribing practices or dosing patterns, many of which are described in other risk factors below, could cause sales of these products to materially decline, or to grow more slowly than expected. The current and expected availability of generic versions of our products has decreased and may continue to decrease our revenues. The approval of new therapies, such as Yutrepia, may negatively impact sales of our current and potential new products. Sales may decrease if any third party that manufactures, markets, distributes, or sells our commercial products cannot do so satisfactorily, or we cannot manage our internal manufacturing processes. Finally, if we are not able to successfully launch Tyvaso DPI when we anticipate, or at all, for regulatory or other reasons, or demand for Tyvaso DPI following its launch does not meet our expectations, the revenue opportunity for our treprostinil products could be significantly lower than we expect. If our products fail in clinical trials, we will be unable to sell those products. To obtain approvals from the FDA and international regulatory agencies to sell new products, or to expand the product labeling for our existing products, we must conduct clinical trials demonstrating that our products are safe and effective. Regulators have substantial discretion over the approval process. Regulators may require us to amend ongoing trials or perform additional trials, which have in the past and could in the future result in significant delays and additional costs and may be unsuccessful. Delays and costs associated with regulatory requirements to change or add trials may cause us to discontinue efforts to develop a product, as they did with Trevyent and the ISR. If our clinical trials are not successful, or we fail to address identified deficiencies adequately, we will not obtain required approvals to market the new product or new indication. We cannot predict with certainty how long it will take, or how much it will cost, to complete necessary clinical trials or obtain regulatory approvals of our current or future products. The time and cost needed to complete clinical trials and obtain regulatory approvals varies by product, indication, and country. In addition, failure to obtain, or delays in obtaining, regulatory approval has in the past and could in the future require us to recognize impairment charges. Our clinical trials have in the past and may in the future be discontinued, delayed, canceled, or disqualified for various reasons, including (1) the COVID 19 pandemic, which initially caused us to suspend enrollment of most of our clinical studies, and may do so again; (2) the drug is ineffective, or physicians and or patients believe that the drug is ineffective, or that other therapies are more effective or convenient; (3) patients do not enroll in or complete clinical trials at the rate we expect; (4) clinical trial sites or third parties do not adhere to trial protocols and required quality controls under good clinical practices ( GCP ) regulations and similar regulations outside the United States; (5) patients experience severe side effects during treatment or die during our trials because of adverse events; and (6) the results of clinical trials conducted in a particular country are not acceptable to regulators in other countries. We may not compete successfully with established or newly developed drugs or products. Competition could negatively impact our operating results. We compete with well established drug companies for market share, as well as, among other things, funding, licenses, expertise, personnel, clinical trial patients and investigators, consultants, and third party collaborators. Many of these competitors have substantially greater financial, marketing, manufacturing, sales, distribution, and technical resources, and a larger number of approved products, than we do. Many of these competitors also possess greater experience in areas critical to success such as research and development, clinical trials, sales and marketing, and regulatory matters. Numerous treatments currently compete with our commercial therapies. For example, for treatment of PAH, we compete with over fifteen branded and generic drugs. Sales of a generic version of Adcirca launched in August 2018 have had a material adverse impact on our sales of Adcirca. The availability of generic versions of Remodulin in the United States could materially impact our revenues, and generic competition has materially impacted our Remodulin revenues outside the United States. Our competitors are also developing new products that may compete with ours. For example, Liquidia is developing Yutrepia, which if successful would compete directly with Tyvaso, Tyvaso DPI (if approved), and our other treprostinil based products. Patients and doctors may discontinue use of our products if they perceive competing products as safer, more effective, less invasive, more convenient, and or less expensive than ours. Doctors may reduce the prescribed doses of our products if they prescribe them in combination with competing products. In addition, many competing therapies are less invasive or more convenient than our products, and use of these competing therapies often delays or prevents initiation of our therapies. 2021 Annual Report 33 The successful commercialization of our products depends on the availability of coverage and adequacy of reimbursement from third party payers, including governmental authorities and private health insurers. Pharmaceutical pricing and reimbursement pressures may negatively impact our sales. The commercial success of our products depends, in significant part, on coverage by governmental payers such as Medicare and Medicaid, and private insurance companies. A reduction in the availability or extent of reimbursement from domestic or foreign government health care programs could have a material adverse effect on our business and results of our operations. Government payers and or third party payers are increasingly attempting to limit the price of medicinal products and frequently challenge the pricing of new or expensive drugs. In many markets outside the United States, governments control the prices of prescription pharmaceuticals through the implementation of reference pricing, price cuts, rebates, revenue related taxes, and profit control. Financial pressures may cause United States government payers and or private health insurers to implement policies that would reduce reimbursement rates for our products, limit future price increases, cap reimbursement rates for pharmaceuticals to rates paid internationally, require the automatic substitution of generic products, demand more rigorous requirements for initial coverage for new products, implement step therapy policies that require patients to try other medicines, including generic products, before using our products, or take other similar steps that could make it more difficult for patients to access our products. Our prostacyclin analogue products (Tyvaso, Remodulin, and Orenitram) and our oncology product (Unituxin) are expensive therapies. Our specialty pharmacy distributors may not be able to obtain adequate reimbursement for our products from commercial and government payers to motivate them to support our products. Third party payers may reduce the amount of reimbursement for our products based on changes in pricing of other therapies for the same disease or the development of new payment methodologies to cover and reimburse treatment costs, such as the use of cost effectiveness research or value based payment contracts. Third party payers often encourage the use of less expensive generic alternative therapies, which has materially impacted our Adcirca revenues and which may materially impact our Remodulin revenues. If commercial and or government payers do not cover our products or limit payment rates, patients and physicians could choose covered competing products and may have lower out of pocket costs. Our manufacturing strategy exposes us to significant risks. We must be able to manufacture sufficient quantities of our commercial products to satisfy demand. We manufacture Remodulin, Orenitram, Tyvaso, and Unituxin, including the active ingredient in each of these products, at our own facilities and rely on third parties for additional manufacturing capacity for Remodulin and Tyvaso. We rely on a variety of third party sole manufacturers for certain elements of our commercial and development stage products, as detailed under the risk factor below entitled, We rely in part on third parties to perform activities that are critical to our business. If any of our internal or third party manufacturing and supply arrangements are interrupted for compliance issues, issues related to the COVID 19 pandemic, or other reasons, we may not have sufficient inventory to meet future demand. Changes in suppliers and or service providers could interrupt the manufacturing of our commercial products and impede the progress of our commercial launch plans and clinical trials. Our internal manufacturing process subjects us to risks as we engage in increasingly complex manufacturing processes. We manufacture our entire supply of Orenitram and Unituxin without an FDA approved back up manufacturing site, and do not plan to engage a third party to manufacture these materials. Our long term organ manufacturing programs will involve exceptionally complicated manufacturing processes, many of which have never been attempted on a clinical or commercial scale. It will take substantial time and resources to develop and implement such manufacturing processes, and we may never be able to do so successfully. Additional risks of our manufacturing strategy include the following We, our third party manufacturers, and other third parties involved in the manufacturing process, such as third parties that operate testing and storage facilities, are subject to the FDA current good manufacturing practices regulations, current good tissue practices, and similar international regulatory standards, and other quality standards related to device manufacturing. Our ability to exercise control over regulatory compliance by our third party manufacturers is limited. We may experience difficulty designing and implementing processes and procedures to ensure compliance with applicable regulations as we develop manufacturing operations for new products. Natural and man made disasters (such as fires, contamination, power loss, hurricanes, earthquakes, flooding, terrorist attacks, and acts of war), disease outbreaks, and pandemics such as COVID 19 impacting our internal and third party manufacturing sites could cause a supply disruption. Even if we, our third party manufacturers, and other third parties involved in the manufacturing process comply with applicable drug and device manufacturing regulations, the sterility and quality of our products could be substandard and such products could not be sold or used or could be subject to recalls. The FDA and its international counterparts would require new testing and compliance inspections of new manufacturers of our products, or new manufacturing facilities we operate. The FDA and other regulatory agencies may not be able to timely inspect our facilities, or those of our third party manufacturers, due to COVID 19 related delays or other reasons, which could result in delays in obtaining necessary regulatory approvals for our products. We may be unable to contract with needed manufacturers on satisfactory terms or at all. 34 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation The supply of materials and comp1nts necessary to manufacture and package our products may become scarce or unavailable, which could delay the manufacturing and subsequent sale of such products. Products manufactured with substituted materials or comp1nts must be approved by the FDA and applicable international regulatory agencies before they could be sold. Our business partners who manufacture the devices to deliver our products are subject to the FDA medical device requirements. Any non compliance, recall, or enforcement action issued against them could adversely impact our sales and operations. The infrastructure of our internal manufacturing facilities, along with certain facilities of our third party manufacturers, is aging. These facilities have highly sophisticated and complex utility systems. If any of these systems requires long term repair or replacement, the impacted facility may not be able to manufacture product for a substantial period of time. We, along with our third party manufacturers, rely upon local municipalities to supply our facilities with clean water, which is processed into high purity water and used as a key ingredient for 3 of our commercial drug products. If local municipalities are unable to supply water that meets relevant quality standards, we and our third party manufacturers may be unable to manufacture product until such a situation is remediated. Our supply chain for raw materials and consumables extends worldwide and is complex. Suppliers based in China play a substantial role in our supply chain. Political unrest or trade disputes involving China or other countries in our supply chain could impact our ability and the ability of our third manufacturers to source raw materials and consumables. Any of these factors could disrupt sales of our commercial products, delay clinical trials or commercialization of new products, result in product liability claims and product recalls, and entail higher costs. Interruptions in our manufacturing process could be significant given the length of time and complexity involved in obtaining necessary regulatory approvals for alternative arrangements, through either third parties or internal manufacturing processes. We face risks and uncertainties related to the COVID 19 pandemic, which could significantly disrupt our operations and or business for an unknown period of time. Our business, operations, financial results, liquidity, and stock price could be adversely impacted by the effects of the global COVID 19 pandemic. The extent of such impact, including the duration and magnitude of such effects, will depend on numerous evolving factors that we cannot currently accurately predict or assess, including, among others the duration and scope of the pandemic, including the emergence of new strains, such as the Delta , Omicron , and future variants; its impact on global and regional healthcare infrastructure, and the ability of patients to obtain medical care; the negative impact on global and regional economies and economic activity; actions governments, businesses, and individuals take in response to the pandemic; the roll out and long term safety and efficacy of vaccines; and how quickly economies and medical systems recover after the pandemic subsides. Our business could be materially adversely affected as a result of the COVID 19 pandemic due to social distancing self isolation, the burden the pandemic has placed on healthcare infrastructure, workplace and physician office closures, travel disruptions, quarantines, and other factors, which could cause, among other things Interruption of our development pipeline. Approvals of new products we are developing, potential label expansions for existing products, and the launch of newly approved products may be delayed or hindered, which would harm our revenue growth prospects. For example, pandemic related supply issues delayed our launch of the Remunity Pump. In addition, enrollment in many of our clinical trials was suspended as a result of the onset of the pandemic. Although enrollment in these studies has resumed, we may experience further delays or difficulties, including delays or difficulties with clinical site initiation and recruiting clinical site investigators and clinical site staff. Our clinical trials, including the integrity and completeness of subject data and clinical study endpoints, may also be impacted or delayed by (1) diversion of healthcare resources away from the conduct of clinical trials due to changes in hospital or research institution policies, governmental regulations, prioritization of hospital and other medical resources toward efforts to cope with the pandemic, or other reasons related to the pandemic; (2) interruption of key clinical trial activities, such as clinical trial site data monitoring, due to limitations on travel imposed or recommended by governments, employers, and others, or other interruption of clinical trial participant visits and study procedures; or (3) any supply interruptions of our investigational drug candidates or other study materials due to staffing shortages, production slowdowns, or stoppages and disruptions in distribution systems. In addition, our pipeline may be delayed by interruption or delays in the operations of the FDA or other regulatory authorities, which are extremely busy responding to the COVID 19 pandemic. Any prolongation or de prioritization of our clinical trials or delay in regulatory review resulting from such disruptions could materially affect the development and study of our new products and label expansions. A decrease in revenues from our existing products. COVID 19 made it difficult or impossible for many patients to visit their physicians offices to determine whether our medicines may be appropriate. As a result, in April 2020 we experienced a temporary decline in the number of new patients starting our treprostinil based medicines. While new patient starts have returned to pre pandemic levels, a decline could recur as the COVID 19 pandemic continues or if the pandemic causes access to medical care to become further restricted, which could cause a negative impact on our revenues. The potential inability of patients to visit their physicians offices or receive required diagnostic testing to ensure reimbursement for our therapies or any inability of specialty pharmacy nurses to visit patients as appropriate to provide training and assistance with the use of our therapies, may also cause existing patients to stop using our medicines or prevent new patients from starting to use our medicines. In addition, virtual meetings by our commercial field based teams with prescribing physicians may not be as effective as in person meetings, which may negatively impact how often physicians prescribe our medicines. Any disruption of our supply chain caused by COVID 19 could also negatively impact our revenues. 2021 Annual Report 35 Disruption of our operations. COVID 19 could disrupt many aspects of our operations, which could harm our business and prospects. Although we implemented a mandatory vaccine requirement in September 2021 for all staff, subject to certain medical and religious exemptions, we continue to maintain a flexible work from home policy for all personnel excluding those necessary to maintain minimum basic operations. Our reliance on personnel working from home may negatively impact productivity, or disrupt, delay, or otherwise adversely impact our business. Working remotely may also increase our cybersecurity risk, create data accessibility concerns, and make us more susceptible to communication disruptions, any of which could adversely impact our business operations or delay necessary interactions with local and federal regulators, manufacturing sites, clinical trial sites, and other third parties. Further, we, and third parties with which we engage to conduct distribution, production, and research and development activities, may experience limitations on the ability to recruit and hire key personnel due to the inability to meet with candidates because of travel restrictions and shelter in place orders. We and third parties with which we engage also may experience operational challenges caused by sickness of employees or their families, the desire of employees to avoid contact with large groups of people, or employees working from home. Mass vaccine production and distribution efforts (such as Operation Warp Speed), as well as backlogs at major ports of entry, have impacted availability and lead times for certain materials used in the manufacture of our products. If we, or our third party suppliers and contract manufacturers, are unable to source materials, it may prevent us from manufacturing our products for an indefinite period until such materials become available. COVID 19, and the volatile regional and global economic conditions stemming from the pandemic, could also precipitate or aggravate the other risk factors discussed in this Report, which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, results of operations, liquidity, and stock price. Further, the COVID 19 pandemic, or any future outbreak of disease, may also affect our operating and financial results in a manner that is not presently known to us or that we currently do not consider to present significant risks. The possible extent of the impact of the COVID 19 pandemic is inherently difficult to predict and will ultimately depend on a number of factors outside our control, including the ultimate duration and severity of the pandemic and the resulting economic impact. We rely in part on third parties to perform activities that are critical to our business. Third parties assist us in activities critical to our operations, such as (1) manufacturing our clinical and commercial products; (2) conducting clinical trials, preclinical studies, and other research and development activities; (3) obtaining regulatory approvals; (4) conducting pharmacovigilance related and product complaint activities, including drug safety, reporting adverse events, and product complaints; (5) obtaining medical device clearances and approvals for the devices used to deliver our drugs; and (6) marketing and distributing our products. Any disruption in the ability of third parties to continue to perform these critical activities, including as a result of the COVID 19 pandemic, could materially adversely impact our business and results of operations. Any change in service providers could interrupt the manufacture and distribution of our products and services, and impede the progress of our clinical trials, commercial launch plans, and related revenues. We rely on various distributors to market, distribute, and sell Tyvaso, Remodulin, Orenitram, and Unituxin. If they are unsuccessful in, or reduce or discontinue, their sales efforts, our revenues may decline materially. Outside the United States, we rely substantially on our international distributors to obtain and maintain regulatory approvals for our products and to market and sell our products in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. In the United States, we derive all of our treprostinil revenues from sales to 2 distributors, Accredo and CVS Specialty. If either of these 2 distributors places significantly larger or smaller orders in a given time period, our revenues can be materially impacted in a way that does not reflect patient demand. Lilly manufactures and supplies Adcirca for us. We use Lilly pharmaceutical wholesaler ne2rk to distribute Adcirca. If Lilly is unable to manufacture or supply Adcirca or its distribution ne2rk is disrupted, it could delay, disrupt, or prevent us from selling Adcirca. We rely entirely on third parties to supply pumps and other supplies necessary to deliver Remodulin. There are a limited number of pumps available in the market, and the discontinuation of any particular pump could have a material, adverse impact on our Remodulin revenues if a viable supply of an alternate pump is not available. We rely entirely on Minnetronix Inc. as the sole manufacturer of the Tyvaso Inhalation System. As Tyvaso is a drug device combination, we cannot sell Tyvaso without the Tyvaso Inhalation System. We rely heavily on MannKind and other third parties to manufacture, test, and store Tyvaso DPI, and to meet all FDA requirements related to the manufacture of Tyvaso DPI. This includes maintaining an FDA compliant facility and addressing any FDA concerns regarding the manufacturing process. If MannKind is unable to manufacture Tyvaso DPI for us for any reason, our commercial sales of Tyvaso DPI (if approved by the FDA) could be materially and adversely impacted. We rely heavily on DEKA and its affiliates for the development, manufacturing, and regulatory approval of the Remunity Pump for Remodulin. Supply disruptions caused by COVID 19 impacted DEKA ability to secure certain comp1nts and raw materials necessary to manufacture sufficient quantities of Remunity Pumps and accessories, delaying our ability to commence commercial sales. Finally, we also rely on various sole source suppliers for manufacturing activities related to ralinepag, RemoPro, and other pumps we are developing for Remodulin. For a further discussion of risks created by the use of third party contract manufacturers, see the risk factor above entitled, Our manufacturing strategy exposes us to significant risks . We rely heavily on third party contract research organizations, contract laboratories, clinical investigative sites, and other third parties to conduct our clinical trials, preclinical studies and other research and development activities. In addition, the success of certain products we are developing will depend on clinical trials sponsored by third parties. Third party failure to conduct or assist us in conducting clinical trials in accordance with study protocols, quality controls, GCP, or other applicable requirements 36 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation or to submit associated regulatory filings, could limit or prevent our ability to rely on results of those trials in seeking regulatory approvals. Reports of actual or perceived side effects and adverse events associated with our products could cause our sales to decrease. Reports of side effects and adverse events associated with our products could affect a physician decision to prescribe or a patient willingness to use our products, which may have a significant adverse impact on sales of our products. An example of a known risk associated with the delivery system used for intravenous Remodulin is sepsis, which is a serious and potentially life threatening infection of the bloodstream caused by a wide variety of bacteria. In addition, Unituxin is associated with severe side effects, and its label contains a boxed warning related to potential infusion reactions and neurotoxicity. We are required to report certain adverse events to the FDA. Development of new products, and new formulations and indications for existing products, could result in new side effects and adverse events which may be serious in nature. Negative attention from special interest groups may impair our business. Our early stage research and development involves animal testing required by regulatory authorities, which we conduct both directly and through contracts with third parties. Our xenotransplantation and regenerative medicine programs rely heavily on the use of animals to manufacture and test our products. Certain special interest groups categorically object to the use of animals for research purposes. Any negative attention, threats or acts of vandalism directed against our animal research activities could impede the operation of our business. We may not maintain adequate insurance coverage to protect us against significant product liability claims. The testing, manufacturing, marketing, and sale of drugs and diagnostics involve product liability risks. We may not be able to maintain our current product liability insurance at an acceptable cost, if at all. In addition, our insurance coverage may not be adequate for all potential claims. If losses significantly exceed our liability insurance coverage, we may experience financial hardship or potentially be forced out of business. Clinical testing and eventual marketing and sale of new products, reformulated versions of existing products, or use of existing products in new indications could expose us to new product liability risks that are not covered by our existing policies. If we fail to attract and retain key management and qualified scientific and technical personnel, we may not be able to achieve our business objectives. Members of our management team, including our founder, Chairperson and Chief Executive Officer, Dr. Martine Rothblatt, play a critical role in defining our business strategy and maintaining our corporate culture. The loss of the services and leadership of Dr. Rothblatt or any other members of our senior management team could have an adverse effect on our business. We do not maintain key person life insurance on our senior management team members. Failure to identify, hire, and retain suitable successors for members of our senior management team and to transfer knowledge effectively could impede the achievement of our business objectives. Our future success also depends on our ability to attract and retain qualified scientific and technical personnel. Competition for such personnel in our industries is intense. If we fail to attract and retain such Unitherians, we may not be successful in developing and commercializing new therapies for PAH and other diseases. Risks Related to Legal Compliance We must comply with extensive laws and regulations in the United States and other countries. Failure to obtain approvals on a timely basis or to comply with these requirements could delay, disrupt, or prevent commercialization of our products. The products we develop must be approved for marketing and sale by regulatory agencies. Our research and development efforts must comply with extensive regulations, including those promulgated by the FDA and the U.S. Department of Agriculture. The process of obtaining and maintaining regulatory approvals for new drugs is lengthy, expensive, and uncertain. The regulatory approval process is particularly uncertain for our transplantation programs, which include the development of xenotransplantation, regenerative medicine, 3 D organ bioprinting, and cell based products. Once approved, the manufacture, distribution, advertising, and marketing of our products are subject to extensive regulation, including product labeling, strict pharmacovigilance and adverse event and medical device reporting, complaint processing, storage, distribution, and record keeping requirements. Our product candidates have in the past and may in the future fail to receive regulatory approval. If granted, product approvals can be conditi1d on the completion of post marketing clinical studies, accompanied by significant restrictions on the use or marketing of a given product and withdrawn for failure to comply with regulatory requirements, such as post marketing requirements and post marketing commitments, or upon the occurrence of adverse events subsequent to commercial introduction. Our ability to obtain FDA approval for our products has been, and in the future may be, materially impacted by the outcome and quality of our clinical trials and other data submitted to regulators, as well as the quality of our manufacturing operations and those of our third party contract manufacturers and contract laboratories. In addition, third parties may submit citizen petitions to the FDA seeking to delay approval of, or impose additional approval conditions for, our products. If successful, citizen petitions can significantly delay, or even prevent, the approval of our products. For example, a third party submitted a citizen petition to the FDA requesting that the FDA refuse to approve Tyvaso DPI, and or impose additional requirements in order to approve the product. This has prompted the FDA to request additional information concerning Tyvaso DPI, and to delay the anticipated review deadline for the Tyvaso DPI NDA from February 2022 to May 2022 2021 Annual Report 37 Regulatory approval for our currently marketed products is limited by the FDA and other regulators to those specific indications and conditions for which clinical safety and efficacy have been demonstrated. Any regulatory approval of our products is limited to specific diseases and indications for which our products have been deemed safe and effective by the FDA. FDA approval is also required for new formulations and new indications for an approved product. While physicians may prescribe drugs for uses that are not described in the product labeling and for uses that differ from those approved by regulatory authorities (called off label uses), our ability to promote our products is limited to those indications that are specifically approved by the FDA. Failure to follow FDA rules and guidelines related to promotion and advertising can result in the FDA refusal to approve a product, suspension or withdrawal of an approved product from the market, product recalls, enforcement action, civil lawsuits, or criminal prosecution. We must comply with various laws in jurisdictions around the world that restrict certain marketing practices. Our business activities may be subject to challenge under laws in jurisdictions around the world restricting particular marketing practices, such as Anti kickback and false claim statutes, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and the United Kingdom Bribery Act. In the United States, the Federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits, among other activities, knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting, or receiving remuneration (i.e., anything of value) to induce, or in return for, the purchase, lease, order or arranging the purchase, lease or order of any health care product or service reimbursable under any federally financed healthcare program like Medicare or Medicaid. This statute is interpreted broadly to apply to arrangements between pharmaceutical manufacturers and prescribers, purchasers, specialty pharmacies, formulary managers, patients, and others. Our practices may not always qualify for safe harbor protection under this statute. The Federal False Claims Act, which prohibits any person from knowingly presenting or causing to be presented a false or fraudulent claim for payment of government funds, or making or causing a false statement material to a false or fraudulent claim. Pharmaceutical and health care companies have faced liability under this law for causing false claims to be submitted because they marketed a product for unapproved and non reimbursable uses. Analogous state laws and regulations, including anti kickback and false claims laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid or, in several states, regardless of the payer, including private payers. Compliance with these and similar laws on a state by state basis is difficult, time consuming, and requires substantial resources. Any investigation, inquiry, or other legal proceeding under these laws related to our operations, even if we successfully defend against it, or any penalties imposed upon us for failure to comply, could have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition or reputation. Sanctions under these federal and state laws may include treble civil m1tary penalties, payment of damages, fines, exclusion of our products from reimbursement under federal health care programs, imprisonment, and the curtailment or restructuring of our operations. Government healthcare reform and other reforms could adversely affect our revenue, costs, and results of operations. Our industry is highly regulated and changes in law or government health care programs may adversely impact our business, operations, or financial results. We cannot predict how future federal or state legislative or administrative changes related to healthcare reform will affect our business. Political, economic, and regulatory influences may lead to fundamental changes in the U.S. healthcare industry, particularly given the current atmosphere of mounting criticism of prescription drug costs in the U.S. We expect there will continue to be legislative and regulatory proposals to change the healthcare system in ways that could impact our ability to commercialize and to sell our products profitably. For example, we anticipate that the Biden Administration, U.S. Congress, state legislatures, and regulators may adopt or accelerate adoption of new healthcare policies and reforms intended to curb healthcare costs, such as federal and state controls on government funded reimbursement for drugs (including in Medicare and Medicaid), new or enhanced requirements to pay prescription drug rebates and penalties to government healthcare programs, and additional pharmaceutical cost transparency measures that aim to require drug companies to justify their prices through required disclosures. At the federal level, there have been and continue to be a number of healthcare related legislative and regulatory initiatives and reforms that significantly affect the pharmaceutical industry. For example, PPACA substantially changed the way healthcare is financed by both governmental and commercial payers, and has significantly impacted the U.S. pharmaceutical industry. The PPACA is a broad measure intended to expand healthcare coverage within the United States, primarily through the imposition of health coverage related mandates on employers and individuals and expansion of the Medicaid program. The PPACA and certain of its provisions have been subject to judicial challenges as well as efforts to repeal or replace them or to alter their interpretation or implementation. It is unclear how the PPACA and its implementation, as well as efforts to repeal, replace, or otherwise modify, or invalidate, the PPACA, or portions thereof, will affect our business. Additionally, there has been increasing legislative, regulatory, and enforcement interest in the United States regarding drug pricing practices. Among other things, there have been several U.S. Congressional inquiries and proposed and enacted federal and state legislation designed to, among other things bring more transparency to drug pricing; reduce the cost of prescription drugs under government payer programs; review the relationship between pricing and manufacturer patient programs; and reform government program reimbursement methodologies for drugs. For example, on November 20, 2020, CMS issued the 38 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation Most Favored Nation demonstration project discussed above, and there is also proposed legislation pending that would establish an international reference price based Medicare Part B drug and biological payment methodology. Individual states in the United States have also increasingly passed legislation and implemented regulations designed to control pharmaceutical and biological product pricing, including price or patient reimbursement limitations, marketing cost disclosure, and transparency measures, and, in some cases, measures designed to encourage importation from other countries and bulk purchasing. In addition, regional healthcare authorities and individual hospitals are increasingly using bidding procedures to determine what pharmaceutical products and which suppliers will be included in their prescription drug and other healthcare programs. We anticipate that the PPACA and other healthcare reform measures that may be adopted in the future may result in additional downward pressure on coverage and the payment that we receive for any approved product, and adversely impact our business. Any reduction in reimbursement from Medicare and other government programs may result in a similar reduction in payment from commercial payers. The implementation of cost containment measures or other healthcare reforms may prevent us from being able to generate revenue, attain profitability, or commercialize our products. Further state and federal healthcare reform measures adopted in the future could limit the amounts that state and federal governments will pay for healthcare products and services, which could result in reduced demand for our products or additional pricing pressure. In October 2020, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services ( HHS ) and the FDA issued a final rule and guidance concerning 2 new pathways for importing lower cost drugs into the United States. The final rule allows certain prescription drugs to be imported from Canada, and the guidance describes procedures for drug manufacturers to facilitate the importation of FDA approved drugs and biologics manufactured abroad and originally intended for sale in a foreign country into the United States. Additionally, in November 2020, the HHS adopted a rule that will eliminate the safe harbor shielding Medicare Part D rebates to pharmacy benefit managers from the Anti Kickback Statute. In response to a legal challenge brought by a trade association representing PBMs, the Biden Administration agreed to delay the effective date of the rule until January 1, 2023 It is difficult to predict the impact, if any, of any such legislation or executive actions on the use of and reimbursement for our products in the United States, including the potential for the importation of generic versions of our products. If we fail to comply with our reporting and payment obligations under the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program or other governmental pricing programs, we could be subject to additional reimbursement requirements, penalties, sanctions, and fines, which could adversely impact our business, financial condition, results of operations, and prospects. We participate in, and have certain price reporting obligations to, the Medicaid Drug Rebate program and other governmental programs that require us to pay rebates or offer discounts on our products. Certain programs, such as the 340B program and the VA FSS pricing program, impose limits on the price we are permitted to charge certain entities for our products or for any future products for which we receive regulatory approval. Statutory and regulatory changes regarding these programs and their requirements could negatively affect the coverage and reimbursement by these programs of our products or any future products for which we receive regulatory approval and could negatively impact our results of operations. Our failure to comply with these price reporting, rebate payment, or pricing requirements could adversely impact our financial results. Applicable laws and regulations, including the PPACA, and regulations promulgated thereunder, could affect our obligations in ways we cannot anticipate. Pricing and rebate calculations vary among products and programs. The calculations are complex and are often subject to interpretation by us, governmental or regulatory agencies, and the courts. If we must restate or recalculate information provided under these programs, our costs of compliance could increase. Additionally, we could be held liable for errors associated with our submission of pricing data, including retroactive rebates and program refunds. We may incur significant civil m1tary penalties if we are found to have knowingly submitted false average manufacturer price or best price information to the government, to have made a misrepresentation in our reporting of ASP figures, to have knowingly provided false information in connection with a Non FAMP filing, or to have charged 340B covered entities more than the statutorily mandated ceiling price. Certain failures to timely submit required data also could result in a civil m1tary penalty for each day the information is late. We could also become subject to allegations under the False Claims Act and other laws and regulations. In addition, misreporting and failure to timely report data to CMS also can be grounds for CMS to terminate our Medicaid drug rebate agreement, pursuant to which we participate in the Medicaid Drug Rebate program. In the event that CMS terminates our rebate agreement, no federal payments would be available under Medicaid or Medicare Part B for our covered outpatient drugs. CMS, the VA, and the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services ( OIG ) have pursued manufacturers that were alleged to have failed to report data to the government in a timely manner. Governmental agencies may also make changes in program interpretations, requirements or conditions of participation, some of which may have implications for amounts previously estimated or paid. We cannot guarantee that our submissions will not be found by CMS, the VA, or other governmental agencies to be incomplete or incorrect. We may be subject to enforcement action or penalties based on our current policy regarding the distribution of 340B program drugs at 340B ceiling prices through third party pharmacies that contract with covered entities participating in the 340B program, known as 340B contract pharmacies . Increasing use of 340B contract pharmacies, coupled with a lack of oversight and transparency, has resulted in increased risks of 340B statutory violations related to the diversion of 340B purchased drugs to individuals who are not patients of the 340B covered entity, and to prohibited duplicate discounts when 340B purchased drugs are also billed to Medicaid. These program integrity risks have been exacerbated by the exp1ntial growth in the use of 340B contract pharmacies over the past decade. We adopted a new 340B contract pharmacy policy to address these risks by limiting shipments to 340B contract pharmacies that meet certain criteria. Our new contract pharmacy policy is intended to 2021 Annual Report 39 preserve patient access, while addressing compliance and integrity concerns resulting from the proliferation of contract pharmacies problems that overshadow and threaten to undermine this vital safety net program. N1theless, certain 340B covered entities and the HHS, in a non binding (and now retracted) Advisory Opinion, stated that, in their view, manufacturers in the 340B program are obligated to sell 340B drugs at the 340B ceiling prices to all contract pharmacies acting as agents of a covered entity. We and certain other manufacturers initiated litigation challenging the Advisory Opinion and HRSA position on contract pharmacies generally. HRSA subsequently withdrew the Advisory Opinion, but issued letters to manufacturers, including us, threatening enforcement action if the manufacturers do not abandon their 340B contract pharmacy policies. We filed suit against HHS and HRSA on June 23, 2021 in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia. On September 22, 2021, HRSA sent to us, along with the other manufacturers challenging HRSA 340B interpretation, letters stating that HRSA is referring this issue to the HHS Office of the Inspector General ( OIG ) for potential enforcement action. We have not had any communication from OIG regarding our 340B contract pharmacy policy. On November 5, 2021, the court granted our motion for summary judgment, ruling that the letters threatening enforcement action contain legal reasoning that rests upon an err1ous reading of Section 340B. HRSA filed a notice of appeal on December 28, 2021, and the appeal is pending. If HRSA prevails on appeal or develops a new theory of liability, we may face enforcement action or penalties as well as adverse publicity. We expect the compliance of policies like ours will continue to be litigated. If we and other manufacturers are unable to curb the proliferation of abuses caused by 340B contract pharmacies, we could see an increased prevalence of sales at reduced 340B ceiling prices, which could have a material adverse impact on our revenues. Patient assistance programs for pharmaceutical products have come under increasing scrutiny by governments, legislative bodies, and enforcement agencies. These activities may result in actions that effectively reduce prices or demand for our products, harm our business or reputation, or subject us to fines or penalties. Company sponsored patient assistance programs, including insurance premium and co pay assistance programs and manufacturers donations to third party charities that provide such assistance, are subject to heightened scrutiny. The Department of Justice ( DOJ ) has taken enforcement action against pharmaceutical companies alleging violations of the Federal False Claims Act and other laws in connection with patient assistance programs. In December 2017, we entered into a civil Settlement Agreement with the U.S. Government to resolve a DOJ investigation of our support of non profit patient assistance programs and paid $210.0 million, plus interest, to the U.S. Government upon settlement. We also entered into a Corporate Integrity Agreement (the CIA ) with the OIG, which requires us to maintain our corporate compliance program and to undertake a set of defined corporate integrity obligations for five years. We may be required to incur significant future costs to comply with the CIA. If we fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements or the CIA, or if our vendors or donation recipients fail to comply with applicable requirements or guidance, we could be subject to penalties including fines, suspension of regulatory approvals that cause us to suspend production, distribution or marketing activities, product recalls, seizure of our products, criminal prosecution, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs, including Medicare and Medicaid, and burdensome remediation measures. Any of these penalties could adversely affect our operating results, the value of our company and our reputation. Patients and physicians may avoid using our products even after we have resolved the issues that led to adverse regulatory action. Members of Congress have called upon the OIG to issue revised guidance about patient assistance programs. Actions taken by the OIG, the DOJ or other agencies as a result of this industry wide inquiry could reduce demand for our products and or coverage of our products by federal and state health care. If any or all of these events occur, our business, prospects, and stock price could be materially and adversely affected. Payers and PBMs have developed mechanisms to limit the benefits of co pay assistance for commercially insured programs through co pay accumulator programs. These programs do not allow a patient using co pay assistance to count the manufacturer co payment contribution toward their annual out of pocket payment maximum. Therefore, patients using co pay assistance are penalized financially for using these programs. Some states have passed legislation to limit the use of co pay accumulator programs, while some other states have indicated that these programs should be allowed to limit cost of care and encourage patients to use lower cost generics. In addition, some states have imposed restrictions on manufacturer co pay programs when therapeutic equivalents are available. Growing use of such programs, or new laws limiting manufacturer ability to provide co pay assistance, could affect patient access to our products and limit product utilization, which may, in turn, adversely affect our business, prospects, and stock price. Improper handling of hazardous materials used in our activities could expose us to significant remediation liabilities. Our research and development and manufacturing activities involve the controlled use of chemicals and hazardous substances. We are expanding these activities in both scale and location. Patients may dispose of our products using means we do not control. Such activities subject us to numerous federal, state, and local environmental and safety laws and regulations that govern the management, storage, and disposal of hazardous materials. Compliance with current and future environmental laws and regulations can require significant costs. The risk of accidental contamination or injury from these materials cannot be completely eliminated. Once chemical and hazardous materials leave our facilities, we cannot control the manner in which such hazardous waste is disposed of by our contractors. We could be liable for substantial civil damages or costs associated with the cleanup of the release of hazardous materials and such liability could have a material adverse effect on our business. 40 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation The increasing use of social media platforms presents new risks and challenges. Social media is increasingly being used to communicate information about our products and the diseases that our therapies are designed to treat. Social media practices in our industry continue to evolve and regulations related to such use are not always clear. This evolution creates uncertainty and risk of noncompliance. For example, patients and others may use social media channels to comment on the effectiveness of a product or to report an alleged adverse event. When such disclosures occur, we may fail to monitor and comply with applicable adverse event reporting obligations or we may not be able to defend against political and market pressures generated by social media due to restrictions on what we may say about our products. There is also a risk of inappropriate disclosure of sensitive information or negative or inaccurate comments about us on any social ne2rking website. If any of these events occur or we otherwise fail to comply with applicable regulations, we could incur liability, face overly restrictive regulatory actions, or incur other harm to our business. Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property and Data Privacy If any of the agreements under which we license or acquired intellectual property rights are breached or terminated, we could lose our rights to continue to develop, manufacture, and sell the products covered by such agreements. Our business depends upon our continuing ability to exploit our intellectual property rights acquired from third parties under product license and purchase agreements covering drugs or other products or technology. We may be required to license additional intellectual property owned by third parties to continue to develop and commercialize our products. This dependence on intellectual property developed by others involves the following risks We may be unable to obtain rights to intellectual property that we need for our business at a reasonable cost or at all; If any of our product licenses or purchase agreements are terminated, we may lose our rights to develop, make, and sell the products to which such licenses or agreements relate; Our rights to develop and market products to which the intellectual property relates are frequently limited to specific territories and fields of use (such as treatment of particular diseases); and If a licensor of intellectual property fails to maintain the intellectual property licensed, we may lose any ability to prevent others from developing or marketing similar products covered by such intellectual property. In addition, we may be forced to incur substantial costs to maintain the intellectual property ourselves or take legal action seeking to force the licensor to do so. Our intellectual property rights may not effectively deter competitors from developing competing products that, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our revenues and profits. The period under which our commercial and developmental therapies are protected by our patent rights is limited. 3 of our U.S. patents covering our current methods of synthesizing and producing treprostinil, the active ingredient in Tyvaso, Tyvaso DPI, Remodulin, and Orenitram, expired in October 2017, and 3 more will expire in 2028. Our patents related to our individual treprostinil based products expire at various times between 2024 and 2031 We entered into settlement agreements with a number of generic drug companies permitting certain companies to launch generic versions of Remodulin in the United States and other companies to launch generic versions of Orenitram and Tyvaso in the United States. A U.S. patent for Adcirca for treatment of pulmonary hypertension expired in November 2017, and FDA conferred regulatory exclusivity expired in May 2018, leading to the launch of a generic version of Adcirca in August 2018. We have no issued patents or pending patent applications covering Unituxin. For further details, please see , Item 1 Business Patents and Other Proprietary Rights, Strategic Licenses, and Market Exclusivity Generic Competition and Challenges to our Intellectual Property Rights. We cannot be sure that our existing or any new patents will effectively deter or delay competitors efforts to bring new products to market, or that additional patent applications will result in new patents. When our patents expire, competitors may develop generic versions of our products and market them at a lower price to compete with our products. Competitors may also seek to design around our patents or exclude patented methods of treatment, such as patent protected indications, from the label for generic versions of our products in an effort to develop competing products that do not infringe our patents. In addition, patent laws of foreign jurisdictions may not protect our patent rights to the same extent as the patent laws of the United States. Third parties have challenged, and may in the future challenge, the validity of our patents, through patent litigation and or initiating proceedings, including re examinations, IPRs, post grant reviews, and interference proceedings, before the USPTO or other applicable patent filing office, or other means. In March 2020, Liquidia filed IPR petitions for 2 of our treprostinil related patents, and in October 2020 the PTAB instituted IPR proceedings with respect to 1 of these patents and declined to institute proceedings with respect to the other patent. In April 2020, we received a Paragraph IV notification letter from Liquidia indicating that Liquidia NDA contains a certification alleging that Yutrepia will not infringe any of the patents currently listed in the Orange Book for Tyvaso because those patents are not valid, not enforceable, and or will not be infringed by the commercial manufacture, use or sale of Yutrepia. In June 2020, we filed a patent infringement lawsuit against Liquidia related to its NDA for Yutrepia. In January 2021, Liquidia filed an IPR petition for an additional patent that we listed in the Orange Book for Tyvaso and asserted against Liquidia in the pending litigation. We are also engaged in patent litigation with ANI related to its ANDA seeking FDA approval to market a generic version of Orenitram. 2021 Annual Report 41 Patent litigation can be time consuming, distracting, and costly, and the outcome may be difficult to predict and unfavorable to us. If we are unsuccessful in the defense of our patents, our business could be negatively impacted. Even if our patents are determined to be valid or enforceable, a competitor could circumvent our patents by effectively designing around the claims of our patents. Accordingly, our patents may not provide us with any competitive advantage. We also rely on trade secrets to protect our proprietary know how and other technological advances that we do not publicly disclose. Our confidentiality agreements with our Unitherians and others to whom we disclose trade secrets and confidential information may not necessarily prevent our trade secrets from being used or disclosed without our authorization. These agreements may be difficult, time consuming, and expensive to enforce or may not provide an adequate remedy in the event of unauthorized disclosure. If our trade secrets were to be lawfully obtained or independently developed by a competitor, we would have no right to prevent such third party, or those to whom they communicate such technology or information, from using that technology or information to compete with us, and our business and competitive position could be harmed. Third parties may allege that our products or services infringe their patents and other intellectual property rights, which could result in the payment of royalties that negatively affect our profits, subject us to costly and time consuming litigation, or cause us to lose the ability to sell the related products. To the extent third party patents to which we currently do not hold licenses are necessary for us to manufacture, use, or sell our products, we would need to obtain necessary licenses to prevent infringement. For products or services that utilize intellectual property of strategic collaborators or other suppliers, such suppliers may have an obligation to secure the needed license to these patents at their cost; if not, we would be responsible for the cost of these licenses. Royalty payments and other fees under these licenses would erode our profits from the sale of related products and services. Moreover, we may be unable to obtain these licenses on acceptable terms or at all. If we fail to obtain a required license or are unable to alter the design of the product to avoid infringing a third party patent, we would be unable to continue to manufacture or sell related products. If a third party commences legal action against us for infringement, we may incur significant costs to defend the action and our management attention could be diverted from our day to day business operations, whether or not the action has merit. An adverse judgment or settlement resulting from the action could require us to pay substantial amounts in damages for infringement or to obtain a license to continue to use the intellectual property that is the subject of the infringement claim, or could result in injunctive relief limiting our ability to develop, manufacture, or sell our products. Information technology security breaches and other disruptions could compromise our information and expose us to legal responsibility which would cause our business and reputation to suffer. We are increasingly dependent on information technology systems and infrastructure, much of which is outsourced to third parties including in cloud based platforms. We collect, store, and use sensitive or confidential data, including intellectual property, our proprietary business information and that of our suppliers, customers, and business partners, and personally identifiable information. The secure maintenance of this information is critical to our operations and business strategy. We are subject to laws and regulations in the United States and abroad, such as the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and European Union regulations related to data privacy, which require us to protect the privacy and security of certain types of information. Our information technology and infrastructure may be vulnerable to attacks by hackers, breached due to employee error, malfeasance, or other disruptions, or subject to system failures. Because the techniques used to obtain unauthorized access, disable, or degrade service, or sabotage systems change frequently and may be difficult to detect for long periods of time, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques or implement adequate preventive measures. Any breaches or failures could compromise sensitive and confidential information stored on our ne2rks or those of third parties and expose such information to public disclosure, loss, or theft. Any actual or alleged unauthorized access, disclosure or other loss of information could result in legal claims or proceedings, liability under laws that protect the privacy of personal information, disruption of our operations, and damage to our reputation, any of which could adversely affect our business, financial condition, or results of operations. Costs we may incur as a result of any of the foregoing, could adversely affect our business, financial condition, or results of operations. Given the increasing use of conferencing technologies to conduct business virtually in light of the COVID 19 pandemic, these cybersecurity risks are becoming more prevalent. Risks Related to Our Financing Capacity, Indebtedness, and Investments If we need additional financing and cannot obtain it, our product development and sales efforts may be limited. We may be required to seek additional sources of financing to meet unplanned or planned expenditures. Unplanned expenditures could be significant and may result from necessary modifications to product development plans or product offerings in response to difficulties encountered with clinical trials. We may also face unexpected costs in preparing products for commercial sale, or in maintaining sales levels of our currently marketed therapeutic products. Our Credit Agreement contains affirmative and negative covenants that, among other things, limit our ability to incur additional indebtedness. If we are unable to obtain additional funding on commercially reasonable terms or at all, we may be compelled to delay clinical studies, curtail operations, or obtain funds through collaborative arrangements that may require us to relinquish rights to certain products or potential markets. 42 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation We may not be able to generate sufficient cash to service or repay our indebtedness, which may have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations, and cash flows. We may borrow up to $15 billion under our Credit Agreement, which matures in December 2025. Currently, our outstanding principal balance is $800.0 million. Our ability to repay or refinance our debt obligations under our Credit Agreement and any future debt that we may incur will depend on our financial condition and operating performance, which are subject to a number of factors beyond our control. We may be unable to maintain a level of cash flows from operating activities sufficient to permit us to pay the principal and interest on our indebtedness. Our inability to generate sufficient cash flows to satisfy our debt obligations would materially and adversely affect our financial position and results of operations. If we cannot repay or refinance our debt as it becomes due, we may be forced to take disadvantageous actions, including reducing or delaying investments and capital expenditures, disposing of material assets or operations, seeking additional debt or equity capital, or restructuring or refinancing our indebtedness. We may not be able to effect any such alternative measures on commercially reasonable terms or at all and, even if successful, such actions may not enable us to meet any such debt service obligations. In addition, our ability to withstand competitive pressures and to react to changes in our industry could be impaired. We may select interest rates under our Credit Agreement that are calculated using LIBOR. The authority that regulates LIBOR announced that it intends to stop compelling banks to submit rates for the calculation of the LIBOR rate used in the Credit Agreement after June 2023 If the relevant LIBOR rate ceases to exist after June 2023, we and Wells Fargo, as the administrative agent, may amend the Credit Agreement to establish an alternate benchmark reference rate. To the extent our interest rates increase, our interest expense will increase, which could adversely affect our financial condition, operating results and cash flows. Our portfolio of investments is subject to market, interest, operational, and credit risk that may reduce its value. We maintain a portfolio of investments that includes (1) corporate debt securities; (2) strategic investments in publicly traded equity securities; and (3) strategic debt and equity investments in privately held companies. These investments are subject to general economic conditions, volatility in the financial marketplace, market and industry wide dynamics, changes in interest rates, industry and company specific developments impacting the business, prospects, and credit ratings of the issuer of the securities, and other factors, each of which has affected, and may in the future affect, the income that we receive from our investments, the net realizable value of our investments, and our ability to sell them. These factors have caused, and could in the future cause, us to (a) experience a decline in our investment income; (b) record impairment charges to reduce the carrying value of our investment portfolio; or (c) sell investments for less than our acquisition cost; each of which in turn could negatively impact our liquidity and our earnings. Our efforts to mitigate these risks through diversification of our investments and monitoring of our portfolio overall risk profile may not be successful and the value of our investments may decline. The privately held companies we have invested in may be particularly susceptible to the factors described above as these companies are typically in the early stages of developing technologies or products that may never materialize, which could result in a loss of all or a substantial part of our investment in these companies. Risks Related to Our Common Stock The price of our common stock can be highly volatile and may decline. The price of common stock can be highly volatile within the pharmaceutical and biotechnology sector. Consequently, significant price and volume fluctuations in the market may not relate to operating performance. The price of our common stock could decline sharply due to general market conditions as well as the following factors, among others Developments related to the COVID 19 pandemic and the associated economic impact, and their effects on our business, financial condition, or results of operations; Quarterly and annual financial results and any failure to meet our expectations or those of securities analysts; Timing of enrollment and results of our clinical trials; Announcements regarding generic or other challenges to the intellectual property related to our products, the launch of generic versions of our products or other competitive products, and the impact of competition from generic and other products on our revenues; Announcements regarding litigation matters, including the lawsuit filed against us by Sandoz and RareGen and our ongoing patent litigation with Liquidia related to its NDA for Yutrepia, among others; Announcements regarding our efforts to obtain FDA approval of, and to launch, new products, such as Tyvaso DPI; Physician, patient, investor, or public concerns regarding the efficacy and or safety of products marketed or being developed by us or by others; Changes in, or new laws and regulations affecting reimbursement of, our therapeutic products by government payers, changes in reimbursement policies of private insurance companies, and negative publicity surrounding the cost of high priced therapies; Announcements of technological innovations or new products or announcements regarding our existing products, including in particular the development of new, competing PAH therapies; 2021 Annual Report 43 Substantial sales of our common stock by us or our existing shareholders, or concerns that such sales may occur; Future issuances of common stock by us or other activity which could be viewed as being dilutive to our shareholders; Rumors or incorrect statements by investors and or analysts concerning our company, our products, or our operations; Failures or delays in our efforts to obtain or maintain domestic or international regulatory approvals; Discovery of previously unknown problems with our marketed products, or problems with our manufacturing, regulatory, compliance, promotional, marketing or sales activities that result in regulatory penalties or restrictions on our products, up to the withdrawal of our products from the market; and Accumulation of significant short positions in our common stock by hedge funds or other investors or the significant accumulation of our common stock by hedge funds or other institutional investors with investment strategies that may lead to short term holdings. Provisions of Delaware law, our charter, bylaws and employment and license agreements, among other things, could prevent or delay a change of control or change in management that may be beneficial to our public shareholders. Certain provisions of Delaware law, our restated certificate of incorporation, and our ninth amended and restated bylaws may prevent, delay, or discourage a merger, tender offer, or proxy contest; the assumption of control by a holder of a large block of our securities; and or the replacement or removal of current management by our shareholders. For example, our restated certificate of incorporation previously divided our Board of Directors into 3 classes. The recent declassification of our Board will be phased in and all directors will not be elected annually until our 2023 annual meeting of shareholders. This provision may make it more difficult for shareholders to replace the majority of directors until such time. It may also deter the accumulation of large blocks of our common stock by limiting the voting power of such blocks. In addition, as a result of our recent conversion to a PBC, our Board is required to consider and balance the financial interests of shareholders, the interests of stakeholders materially affected by our conduct, and the pursuit of our specific public benefit purpose when evaluating takeover offers. This requirement of Delaware PBC law may make our company a less attractive takeover target than a traditional for profit corporation. Non competition and all other restrictive covenants in most of our employment agreements will terminate upon a change of control that is not approved by our Board. Similarly, a change of control, under certain circumstances, could accelerate the vesting of outstanding stock options, and restricted stock units. Any increase in our stock price resulting from the announcement of a change of control, and our broad based change of control severance program, under which Unitherians may be entitled to severance benefits if they are terminated without cause (or they terminate their employment for good reason) following a change of control, could make an acquisition of our company significantly more expensive to the purchaser. We enter into certain license agreements that generally prohibit our counterparties or their affiliates from taking necessary steps to acquire or merge with us, directly or indirectly throughout the term of the agreements, plus a specified period thereafter. We are also party to certain license agreements that restrict our ability to assign or transfer the rights licensed to us to third parties, including parties with whom we wish to merge, or those attempting to acquire us. These agreements often require that we obtain prior consent of the counterparties if we contemplate a change of control. If these counterparties withhold consent, related agreements could be terminated and we would lose related license rights. For example, Lilly and MannKind have the right to terminate our license agreements related to Adcirca and Tyvaso DPI, respectively, in the event of certain change of control transactions. These restrictive change of control provisions could impede or prevent mergers or other transactions that could benefit our shareholders. Our shareholders must rely on stock appreciation for any return on their investment in us. We have never paid, and do not intend to pay, cash dividends. Our Credit Agreement may restrict us from doing so. As a result, the return on an investment in our common stock depends entirely upon the future appreciation, if any, in the price of our common stock. Our exclusive forum bylaw may limit our shareholders ability to bring a claim in a forum that they find favorable for disputes with us or our directors, officers, or other Unitherians. Our bylaws provide that, to the fullest extent permitted by law, unless we agree in writing to an alternative forum, (a) the Delaware Court of Chancery (or, if such court does not have, or declines to accept, jurisdiction, another state court or a federal court located in Delaware) will be the exclusive forum for any complaint asserting any internal corporate claims, including claims in the right of the corporation based upon a violation of a duty by a current or former director, officer, Unitherian, or stockholder in such capacity, or as to which the Delaware General Corporation Law confers jurisdiction upon the Court of Chancery, and (b) the federal district courts will be the exclusive forum for any complaint asserting a cause of action arising under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The choice of forum provision may limit our shareholders ability to bring a claim in a forum that they find favorable for disputes with us or our directors, officers, or other Unitherians, and may discourage such lawsuits. There is uncertainty as to whether a court would enforce this provision. If a court ruled the choice of forum provision was inapplicable or unenforceable in an action, we may incur additional costs to resolve such action in other jurisdictions. Our choice of forum provision is intended to apply to the fullest extent permitted by law to the above specified types of actions and proceedings, including any derivative actions asserting claims under state law or the federal securities laws. Our shareholders will not be 44 United Therapeutics, a public benefit corporation deemed, by operation of the choice of forum provision, to have waived our obligation to comply with all applicable federal securities laws and the rules and regulations thereunder. In September 2021, we converted to a Delaware PBC. Conversion may not result in the benefits that we anticipate, requires our directors to balance the interest of shareholders with other interests, and may subject us to additional litigation and other risks. On September 30, 2021, our shareholders approved an amendment to our restated certificate of incorporation to become a PBC, and we completed the conversion to a PBC that same day. While our Board believes that our conversion to a PBC is in the best interest of shareholders, our status as a PBC may not result in the benefits that we anticipate. For example, we may not be able to achieve our public benefit purpose or realize the expected positive impact from being a PBC. 1 of the primary distinctions between a PBC and a traditional Delaware for profit corporation is that, in making decisions, the directors of a PBC have an obligation to balance the financial interests of shareholders, the interests of stakeholders materially affected by the PBC conduct, and the pursuit of the corporation specific public benefit purpose. The application of this balancing obligation may allow our directors to make decisions that they could not have made pursuant to the fiduciary duties applicable prior to PBC conversion. There is no guarantee that our Board will resolve conflicts among the financial interests of our shareholders, our specific public benefit purpose, or stakeholders materially affected by our conduct, in favor of our shareholders financial interests. For instance, in a sale of control transaction, our Board would be required to consider and balance the factors listed above and might choose to accept an offer that does not maximize short term shareholder value due to its consideration of other factors. This requirement of Delaware PBC law may make our company a less attractive takeover target than a traditional for profit corporation. A Delaware PBC must also provide its shareholders with a statement, at least every other year, as to the PBC assessment of the success of its efforts to promote its public benefit purpose and the best interests of those materially affected by the PBC's conduct. If the public perceives that we are not successful in promoting our public benefit purpose, or that our pursuit of our public benefit purpose is having a negative effect on the financial interests of our shareholders, that perception could negatively affect our reputation, which could adversely affect our business, results of operations and stock price. In addition, Delaware's PBC statute may be amended to require more explicit or burdensome reporting requirements that could increase the time and expense required to comply. As a Delaware PBC, we may be subject to increased litigation risk. Shareholders of a Delaware PBC (if they, individually or collectively, own the lesser of (1) 2 percent of the PBC outstanding shares; or (2) shares with a market value of $2 million or more on the date the lawsuit is instituted) can file a derivative lawsuit claiming the directors failed to balance shareholder and public benefit interests. Traditional Delaware for profit corporations are not subject to this potential liability. As a PBC, we may be subject to increased derivative litigation, which may be costly and require management attention, which may adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. In addition, there is currently limited case law involving PBCs (including case law interpreting and applying the balancing obligation of PBC directors), which may expose us to additional litigation risk generally until additional case law develops or additional legislative action is taken. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments N1 Item 2 Properties
